GRINNELL COLLEGE

SCARLET 8: BLACK

THE STUDENT

NEWSPAPER

 

Vol. LXXV!

Grinnell. Iowa, Friday. May lb, 1959

No. 23

 

To Seniors:

EVENING

Slowly now the evening changes his garments

held for him by a rim of ancient trees,-

you gaze: and the landscape divides and leaves you,
one sinking and one rising toward the sky.

And you are left, to none belonging wholly,

not so dark as a silent house, nor quite

so surely pledged unto eternity

as that which grows to star and climbs the night.

To you is left (unspeakably confused)

your life, gigantic, ripening, full of tears,

so that it, now hemmed in, now grasping all,
is changed in you by turns to stone and stars

vRilke

know by lulu x...

 

Page Two

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. May lb, lm

__M

DITORIALS

Outdated Educational Requirements Need Updating

As the fatality list of the class of ’69 increases with each ad-
ditional “unacceptable fulfillment” (according to the faculty),
of various requirements, we find our respect for the highly valued
Grinnell degree and our faith in the meaning of a liberal educa-
tion shattered. it is reasonable to expect that the college will
establish certain criteria that must be met before one can receive
a diploma, which is supposed to signify some level of meaningful
accomplishment. If the college expects the diploma to have any
.value, then certainly the requirements must have value.

One of these requirements, the comprehensive examinations,
is described in the college catalogue as a test “designed to moti-
vate, and to evaluate, the student’s progress toward mastery of
his special field of learning.” This year unfortunately, we have
seen how much the comprehensives, as a purported measure of
this “progress,” have fallen short of their original goal. More spe-
cifically people are being screwed out of graduating because of an
exam which has become dysfunctional, although none of the
"powers that be” care to admit it!

We feel that the present comprehensive examinations have
failed to reach their educational, as well as their evaluative goals.
How many departments examine a student’s ability to integrate
his learned techniques, knowledge and experiences and not just
his ability to regurgitate recently acquired facts? But even when
comprehensives are aimed at pure evaluation of a student’s per-
formance they so often completely miss the mark. Orals and
many written exams are known to have low reliability. This
means that there is a greater tendency for an individual faculty
member to be inconsistent in his grading, for many faculty mem-
hers to give a wide range of grades to the same quality exams,
and for students to be inconsistent in their performance. Not to
mention the actual value of “grading” anyone‘s intellectual ac-
complishments. With all of this variability, comprehensives are
still considered to have enough evaluative merit to keep some
people from graduating!

And if the test is an evaluative one, why can’t students keep
taking them until they pass? What true justification is there for
scheduling the make-up exam in August in this day and age of
cramming? On the other hand, since some students did not have
to take comprehensives this year, how does the school justify
graduating these particular seniors, but not graduating those who
have “failed” under a highly questionable evaluative system?

We recognize that many of the problems mentioned occur
with numerous tests given throughout the school year. but be—
cause comprehensives are still basically a one-shot affair, with
so much attached importance that they are a to-graduate-or-not-
to—graduate question, their many inequities cannot be tolerated,
We believe that this year all of the seniors should be allowed to
graduate regardless of their performance on their comprehen-
blves,

As a final note, we would like to suggest that the goal of
a comprehensive could be better served by a senior thesis, or at
least a senior seminar or a required independent. This would
more fairly and helpfully ”motivate and evaluate the student’s
progress toward mastery of his special field of learning,” and
would be a real educational experience worthy of undertaking,
r , . , 1

Why Do Yoii Exisi? 7

The academic standing of three mem-
bers oi lhe [acuity is now being con-
sidered hy the newly lormed Sllllng
Comml‘nee on Faculty Standing

 

The Scarlet & Black

Student Newspaper of
Grinnell College,

Grinnell, lowa

An mdcponocni none
publnhou moldy.

rcpt during holidays

nu l'xamlnauml pcrloda,
ﬂoy lhc annual: cum.
K ullllee on Student Publlr
.4 ., .ra- (.ululls. Silhscrimlon
“KIM,“HJ r c soon per whunl

yinr,

The unideuulied members oi the facul-
ty who recently completed the compro
hensive examination aimed at venrymg
their academic slanding, were asked to,
“Justify your exrslcnce m 25 welds or
less, Start here.”

Editor
lxhsm a Mnnuuur

susmy lrnrsm
ukuc: s'luolu
pawn swcu

lee 0|ilel's taking comps ibis Spring,
one response was pl'elzlceil, “I consider
this presumptuous but I will go along ,y Iiill'lor .
will the gag wilh me hope ihdi llle pror muw
motels will learn something from it," CW W‘"

His juslilicuuon done ll! 25 words, was, “WM

"As a poruon of noun-e l have as much
right to exist as any other creature.

EXISTENCE—
,( Continued Page 12, Column 2)

ANDREW
Michael urnudnu,
Kinky Bull, Dun cu iuz.

Ken Hicks, Susan lunn,

umuy Knrlson, l’ﬂer Kucnncws,
.Iunu Smilh, Tom luomm.
Richard Wicxnrom

talk of the town

News from the Farm in the Morning
Hy FREDRICKA NELSON

with Quotable Quotes from the mouths
of Emles all around

i’m wrillng imm the living mom or
another place, no longer 8271/, broad,
ralher the newly souled farmhouse that
ls going to be a home it it takes as long
as twenty years. we moved here one
weelll ago last saturday and are getling
more at home each day, though organ-
ized we’re not, and the garden, the pump.
the lawn, the workshop, nature and new
puppies all wait on us. soon and niki,
deslonde and the whole cat family live
out here together, and i’m the one on let
you all know about me living.

there is a (rent porch picture some-
where in this paper and i will tell you
a little geography, ﬁrst of all, we are
twelve miles out east of grinnell on
the east side of a gravel road, with nee:
on the north and east sides, and ﬁelds
to the rear. the farm isn't ours or the
fields, just the house and its outbuild—
lugs, and the garden and the grove. the
porch looks at the sunset through scotch
pines and evergreen trees that are just
on the other bank of the road. right he-
hind the porch is the dining room, a real.
tarnilysrzed one even ii we’ve only got
the long table so Jar. we haven’t had a
big meal around it since we just got the
oven a few days back, but that could
happen any time. the house has lois of
good sized moms and a real bath and a
real kitchen. there's a back porch and a
basement . .and lordy. us got the feel
of a mansion to us tranSlents til now.

there must he 8 better word than
“growing-up” for waniing to get oneseli
settled in a beautiful and comfortable
place. not settling any longer for a nine-
month year or a summer vacation in a
sublet that you've not quite got the time
tor. . , .no, no more at that, though some
gypsy eyes might lead us off away for a
Winter now and lhen. a place like a farm
is a place to stay in while after
you’ve had what you wanted
from cities and universities and crowds.
the thin gs to do are always
there, where ever you go, only some
times they’re free and other times they
might cost $250 a throw. excuse me, but
how can you compare a porchtul of
morning glories in the sunset to 3 and
lime! flick?

i‘m terribly prejudiced, but i think odd
lime questions like that really aren't
just little after all. the last time i
wrote this column 1 had a few words
about America. i still have some and i
have a hunch they are multiplying. or
course it means a lot where you started
your life, and i don’t make a persistent
habit of ”americanlzmg" my lnends
lrorn other places to my kind or n-lyihs
about a place — never could be so pre-
sumptuous.

where you really want to be — not
in chasing some abstract cloud or busy
band-wagon — by working devotedly at
relationships with people and places and
owers that be. right outside this window
n the rising sun there are those powers
working in the clouds and through the
trees. wind ls blowing, and the water
coming down is heated up by the sun to
ﬂy lmo the sky all over again. green
things in the front yard are pushing up
and squirming around together Io find
the sun and keep a straight backbone.
the light comes and goes and the lilacs
am blooming.

this morning l’m up after working on

FRED and her sat at the form.

I paper all night, but i can‘t be con-
cemed over much with getting it done
in a hurry. . . .not when men! ouch
spring r‘aisin’ up outside.

school work is fine, but it should never
be approached as work, only as pastime
or pleasure and pressure shouldn’t have
to exist, my tardy paper is on an and its
coming together though it still can't
usurp all the real art all around art 1:
good news lately, with the opening of
u. oi i. new building last Saturday and
a happening by allan kaprow that was
more than you might have found easy
to believe in the papers. kaprow is one o(
the warmest people We met and he’s
very open to all kinds of experience,
exemplary for some. on the local art
scene, grinnell’s own happening is today
~right now this lnsiani, readeritriday.
my 16th on barber plaza. everybody got
on over to it right now.

one more thing and then a goodbye. do
take care to clean your spiritual beings
oi mischiol before the happening - ouija
Will and you out when yoll get zhere. you
might be harbouring the spring gnat and
all at once he could get called right out
of you e lllen where would you be?

the country is free and peaceful in
these bad times, and we're havin’ good
luck now we share it with you

FRIENDS on the front porch at the new country home,

 

Friday. May l5, mt

SCARLET AND BLACK

Page Thin

 

LETTERS

Anonymous Wife

To the Editor".

Last weekend I attended I delightful
blue grass concert in South Lounge.
Alter a few songs the ﬁve participant:
were introduced. Four had names. The
filth was Ed Foster's gorgeous anony«
mous wiie. I can remember when Jan
Kennedy (now Foster) had a name and
attributes, not all physlual, or her own.
Here's to that grand old strictly aca-
demic sense of equality.

Molly Malcom

Crossett Cuts Again

To the Editor:

I wish to comment on a Iew statements
made In the last issue of the 5&3.

t. In reply to the defense oi abortion
presented by Miss Mary Malcolm and
Mrs, ingham: the moment the sperm
penetrates the egg, the rights oi the
Child begin, and ollr failure to Communi-
tote with the child does not lessen his
right to his rights. Perhaps, it iie could
communicate with him, we would lintl
that he pleierred We even under all-
\‘El‘Se circumstances. Since contracep—
tives are not entirely ellicient and are
olten immoral, the only way to avoid
killing innocent helpless babies by shot.
tion is abstinence. I do not see how those
who Commit fornication or who think
sexual pleasure is an end in ltselt are
entitled to avoid the consequences at
their actions by childrmurdeI'Aand that
is what a ortion is: a sophisticated ton-n
0i infant' de. Our crude ancestors used
to expose new-born babies on hillsides;
those who favor abortion, technically
more ingenious but morally no better,
would scrape them lrom the utenls.

2. Since both Mr. Theodore Click and
Mr. Jellrey Gordon have both admitted
that their inversion ol the llag was an
act ol impulse, perhaps it needs to be
pointed out to them that impulse is not a
justification. Mr. Gordon, in the more
honorable of the two statements, Con-
fesses that his act was a “vent {or .
trustrations and nothing more." Mr.
Glick seems to think that ends justifies
the means — a doctrine that can be u d
by any thug as well as by Mr. Glick ~
and his end is that he "be satisfied and
gratified." lt ls ditlicult to imagine a
more sellish and egocentric attitude.

3. Where Mr. Glick's conscienceless
ness moves on its blandly smug traclr,
Mr. Gordon and Mr. Ronald Steinhorn
show some dim sense that what they
did was wrong. Alas, however, with the
usual cry — baby philosophy oi today's
“acllvtsls,” they at once seek to place
the blame elsewhere. “We had no idea
that all this would happen,“ they ex-
claim, as it their ignorance were an
excuse, as if their defense at impulse
did not prevent deliberation and consul-
tation, as it they had not been warned
oi their lolly. Even Mr. Kenneth Hicks,
who wrote the most reasoned oI the

TA§TY
PASTRY

Bakery
éoods

263-43“

accounts, lapses into this moral buck-
pa’ ing in his closing paragraphs. “It
i " he writes, “amazing that we (stu
dents) couldn't see this would happen.
1 agree: it is amazing. But there are
none so blind as those who will not see.
History is a subject taught at Grinnell
—and taught well. But perhaps students
do not elect to study history. it
would appear so. I remember last year,
at a discussion at drain-card burning,
how an elderly mother from the town
spoke up in detense oi patriotism. She
was not very articulate and had none at
the students sophisticated wit. In desper<
ation she appealed to them- “Don‘t you
know that a lot of good men died in the
last war so that you could have your
freedom?" And all that one student Could
say to her was. “That all happened he-
iote l was born. I don't know anything
about that." When the day comes to
write the epitaph tor the present clamor
ill the minority mol) 0! students, that
line might serve. “I don’t. know anything
about that."
John Ctosselt
Classical Languages

Theater Defense

To the Editor:

In the l *t two weeks there have been
three reprints of the instructions to our
l‘eceni reading list lor compl‘ellenslves in
Theatre, courtesy at Miss Tinker and
novi the 5&3. The list which [ollows
was approved by the staff, but the in-
trodiictory statement was mine. i would
like to explain it. The reading list was
certainly diverse and probably stimu-
latiiig, ranging lrom Shakespeare to
Schechnel. Reviewing can be a deadly
dull business and we hoped the read-
ings would provide our tour majors
with a legitimate but provocative means
loi- getting basic concepts and informaa
(ion back in mind, at. the same time
suggesting several new concerns. I an
tempted a bit ot hyperbole in the linal
statement (“a deep, considered coniu<
sion"). Students have several defenses
against such academic levity: to ignore
it, laugh at it, or ask what it means,
But to use it as the topic sentence for
a sermonette on creativity seems lav
fetched.

Another matter. Miss McGuire's article
on the Tinker matter (May 2) has me
saying something coniusing about prece-
dents. What the lnlerviewer and l dis
cussed was the last that since there are
college rules on mmprehensive require-
ments, and they concern all departments,
one department cannot independently do
cide to ignore them. The proper ap-
proach seems to be the one being ex.
plol'ed now, a careiul review oi the
problem by laculty and students.

And a last matter. Speaking lor my<
sell, I'm puzzled by Miss Tinker's mo-
tlon (noted in the McGuire article)
that her two untaken exams should be
averaged with her lirst exam. As she
knows, her first examination was In
Speech (a two course requirement which
ends with this year’s seniors). Miss
Tinker has not yet iulillled her require-
ments in what might be called her area
of concentration but which I think should
be more accurately called her maior.

Porter Woods
Director of the Theater

Emotionulism Decried

(EDITORS NOTE: The lollowlng letter
was sent to the sol; as well as to
Mr. Glick, tram a Grimell Citizen, We
leel it gives important insights about
many public attitudes.)

Dear Mr. Glick:

You asked for understanding ot your
nag faux pas. i understand you. You
are a highly emotional young man woe-
tuliy inciting in judgment, reason and
logic.

As you lie on the green grass or cen-
tral campus envisioning lragmentation
bombs and napalm raining down, turn
your eyes to nearby Sixth Avenue. imaa
gine how many oI the travelers on that
highway wlll reach Des Moines or lowa
City alive and hoiv many will scream
their death agony iii the naming wreck-
age or crushed curs, More men, women
1 .l Children are k'llctl o: maimed each
year on United States highways than
i. .2 been lragmented oi- capahneu or
otherwise killed or injured in the Whole
cent as otoiir participation in the Vietnam

the dollar cost of this slaughter

» . y exceeds what no spend tor the

1 miich gi-imincr, more immor-
L sily problem i is right
on your doc iep. Get up all your bucks
anti nci constructively in help end the
highway slaughter As you lie on cen-
tral campus, notice the blue sky above
you. Put your ear to the ground and
hear [he subterranean coursing oi the
waters of the earth. Then imagine the
painlul deaths from leukemia and lung
cancer raining down from the polluted
air of the blue sky. imagine the poisons
01 pollutions in the waters on and under
the earth. Another problem on your door—
step. Get oll your back. Quit mewling
and start moving.

There are many other problems on
your doorstep. Turning a piece oi cloth
upside down wotl't cure them. Get on
your back. Stop shirlting. .start work-
ing. it you must concentrate your emi»
tioiis on the Vietnam War. imagine the
headman 0i a Vietnamﬁe Village gutted
and hung to die with his entrails spilling
onto the ground for the pigs to root in,
while his wife and Children look on, too
Cong-terrorized even to Wail their grlet.
Imagine the bloody shambles left by I
bomb detonating in a Vietnamese civi-
li.m hospital or a Saigon street. These
are the tactics ot those you support . . .
not “unclvilized” Americans.

While you lie on the grass with cmir
Lions ableed, think of all the Vietnamese,
Laotians, Cambodians, Chinese, East
Germans, Czechoslovaltinns and Cubans
who are condemned against their wills
to live and die spiritually under Cam-
munist rule.

use your reason to imagine why so
many thousands at these people are
risking their lives to escape.

Think too, that your emotions and hys<
tericel actions are giving heart to the
Vlet Cong, North Vietnamese, Chinese
and Russian overlords who will prolong
the war Wlllle it is to their advantage
to do so, at whatever sacrifice in human
liie. Americans in Paris and at home
are wllllng to negotiate, willing to make
concessions, and as eager for peace as
you and l The Communists are not.

See You Next Season.

UnderclaSsmenl
GOOD LUCK THIS SUMMER

ALWAYS FIRST QUALITY AT

Penney:

AWAY. was! W

The longer they stall, the greater tho
help they receive lrom emotional irra-
tional American dissenters. Lie them
on central campus and think of your
personal responsibility for lives let in
a war you are helping to prolong.

inverting the American tlag on the
central campus of Grinnell college in the
heart of lawn is like blowing into [ht
wind. it is a study in lutility. We need
solutions to our problems and construc-
tive action to implement them.

Get off your back. Discipline your
emotions. Quit rationalizing and start
reasoning. Attack some at the problems
on your doorstep which your intellect
might help correct. Protest the war . .
any war . . . YESl But make your pro-
lest count. 60 to nanoi, or Peking, or
Moscow. Picket the North Vietnamese in
Paris.

0t course, you'll have to get oll your
back to do this. You'll have to work,
sutter, and perhaps the lot your cause.
it here will be no glamour or headlines.
You’ll get your kicks, not from the Fun
0i shocking your elders, but in tho
teeth . . Communists are not patient
with dissenters, But you will have earned
respect train the many Americans who
are working diligently and quietly to
bring an end to our ills. You will gain
an emotional serenity from thoughtful,
constructive action which will cause you
to shudder iihen you remember your
present puenlity.

Sincerely,
Mrs. Edith Jones Appleby ‘33
Grinnell, Iowa

Gliclt's Response

To the Editor:

To respond lully to what Mrs. Appleby
says would take at least a ten page let<
[er and four or live books. Therefore I
will matte just three statements in the
hope that these statements Start Mrs.
Appleby on a search tor some more
information about (1) the Vast gull’ be<
tween this country's stated principle:
and practices and (2) the reality ol Come
munism and the conditions in “Commulr
isi” countries and the underdeveloped
world.

l. Mrs, Appteby obviously does not
think Vietnamese are people; she could
not make her statement, “More men,
women, and Children are killed 01'
maimed each year on United States
highways than have been lragmented or
napalmed or otherwise killed or iii-
jured in the whole course or our partic
patton in the Vietnam war," it She inA
cluded the people ot Vietnam in her tig-
ures.

2. Mix. Appleby, unlortunately but
understandably (because oi the propa-
ganda of the mass media), believes that.
Communism is automatically evil and
that our system is automatically un-
qualified good. I wish she would do some
reading on the history oi Communist
countries and the living conditions of the
people In these countries, as well as the
llvmg conditions at many people in this
country ol unbelievable atiluerice. Pee
haps she would see that while there is
EVII in Communism, there is also evil in
Capitalism; while there is good in Capi-
talism, there is also good in Communism.

3. Mrs. hppleby is completely right
when she tells me to get out and go to
work; that is what i am going to do, now
that lhave retumed my dratt cards and
demonstrated by my action my revulsion
against this country's madness and blind
anti-communism. It there is anything
constructive to pick up from her letter it
rs just that thought; i don't tool that it
is right to stay in college doing nothing
but inverting a flag when this country
is acting in the manner which it is. it'l
time to get to work.

P. S. To all Grinnell Sludeu ‘ r5,
Appleby is highly repiesentative oi . real
world" opinion. One question: is your
Grinnelt education teaching you at this
tact and bow to repond to i‘"

Ted Slick

 

Page Four.

SCARLET AND BLACK

‘ Training Session for New S.A.'s

By JANET sworn

From a field of 121 candidates, 29
men and 30 women were selected as
student adviser-s for next year. The se<
lection committee, four resident advisers
and lour student advisers, tried to
choose a cr'usssectlon oi students. Al»
though looking for [lie qualities of “lile
iriaiive, dependability, flexnbility, anti
social sensitivity," they avoided stress-
ing any one personality type.

Each class has a nearly equal num
her or representatives Villo Will be placed
iii halls according to special abilities
and interests alter room drnwin ». Res
ident adviser Marilyn Cochran, chair-
man of the committee, noted that due to
the large number of qualilied applicants,
several highly recommended people
weren’t selected. She urged interested
students to reapply next year.

Several students told the 5&1} that
they think the S.A. selection committee
rejected them because of their lerrist
political beliefs. The sludenis indicated
that the committee probably believed
that there would be natural communi-
cation barriers between students ulth
leftist tendencres and their adviseesi

This Weekend two S.A. orientation ses-
sions were held in Darby andahe \Vom-
ens’ Gym, The selected students hecanre
better acquainted with each other and
taliiiliarized themselves with the "ques-
tions, goals, and subtleties" oi the pro»
gram.

Saturday night Loose Hall R. A. Ken

Etzkorn directed encounter group games.
demonstrating through artificial means
the workings oi interpersonal relation-
ships. The games were intended to help
participants gain insight into how they
View themselves, how they ailcct others,
and how they reacr to others. On Sunday
the group examined hypothetical case
studies, proposing possible solutions to
common problems.

Tile orientation sessions were la-
iy experimental and met With d se
reactions, ranging tiom enthusiastic ap-
proval to dismissal as a haste or time.
Workshops lieltl ill the fall before now
student days Will continue to prepare
the students advisers for their new res
poristhilities.

Among the changes in this year's
program is the addition at an Advisory
Board, Formed by the Student Affairs
Committee. The Board will ConSist of
Mr. Obermiller, Mr. Haas, two students
elected by the students adVIsers, two
students selected by SGA, a resident adr
viser, and a Dean. The advisory board
will work closely with the Student atl-
visers, recommending programs and
speakers useiul in creating an enjoyable
hall atmosphere.

The student advisers hope to lose their
image as merely troublershooters and
problem-solvers. ideally, they Will occu»
py a more positive position as a catalyst
for initiating exciting activities in cone
junction with the interests of the hall
members.

News Briefs
Speakers Take Cash

Five men and three women were
awarded top prizes in the 1969 Hill speakr
ing competition. The speakers gave
live to seven minute extemporaneous
speeches on such topics as: international
Affairs, Education and Campus. and Na—
ilonal Affairs and the Cities.

Tire winners in the women’s compe-
tition were:

Fil‘Sf’BOlllile Tinker — $30, second —
Jane Sparacuto — $20, Tlliitl — Linda
Cutler ~ $10.

Tire winners in the men’s competition
here

First ~ Bruce Barnes 7 $30. second —~
Neil Fischer g $le, Third —‘ Brynn
Enligei’t — S5, Greg Tliielmall — $5,
Gregg Sayre 7 55,

Play épens

Anthol Fugard's The Blood Knot Will
be presented in Arena Theater Monday
through Wednesday of exam week at
3:00 p.m. The play is Fugaid’s first, and
concerns two lialirbrolhei's, one light<
skinned and one dar skinned, who must
discover and then live with Ihe lie that
binds them together. The setting is south
Alrica, and surprisingly, the play has
been produced in that country. Henry
Wingate and Ken Hicks compose the
cast. Rosemary lngnam directs. Take
an exam break It. is well worth the
effort,

 

STORAGE SPECIAL

w. .t Meoltar Laundry Ind Clrsneri want to irslp you with in. storing oi your winter clothing ind
household iiemx you don't wsnr is take horn. in the Spring .nd lug back in ii». fill.

The cost of Haring that. items will be 2 per cent oi your declared uluriion. plui the coli‘ oi clun.
ing ind pressing; or rim only com .r. 57. at deal-rod value — minimum chlrgl two doll-n plr 0rd".

nth year we wunt to make it it convmieni .i panibll tor you. do we hm made .rr.ng.m.ntr with
City Cub cs. phone 236-4689. to pick up your clothing .1 in. curb nurnt your dormitory .t No cost

TO YOU.

INSTRUCTIONS: Pickup 5 storage bag it Meakers. office st |0|9‘/i Broad Street or your college campul
agency can arrange to have a storage bag delivered it; you. Hm your liir tilled out and garments in lisp
hoists calling ihe City Cal: cs. phone 236-4898.

We will check your list and mail to your llama a recei l lor llre Hem: slorodi All garment: will be
cleaned and ”aim removed. llren in the loll your gormenir will be freshly pressed and ready to wear. Excep-

lion —— store only it not cleaned or pressedi We will return them is your college campus Agency and ii.
111' site will receive iull :ommission.

Here are the rodeo conveniencex and protection; you will receive if you slore your qrrmunii with

Meeker'x.

1. Day or night iaxi rsryice. — 235.4998,
2. inrured against moiii and mildew amigo. in. or titan.
1 Available handy iron: and valuation inn.

4. We will relum iii. order in your colleg. clmpux Agent H: or in. will receive iull commission.

5. Eighty-on. yearx at continuum laundry and cleaning experience.
is. Fieilily pressed .nd may to wm in His full. (Except tier. onlyl.
7. You may also ride downtown in Meeker“: with your clothei it No cost TO you.

tiiEEiéEg LAUNDRY/tin CLEANING

SERVlNG THlS COMMUNITY FOR OVER SEVENTY FIVE YEARS
Inﬁll: BROAD STREET 0 GRINNELL. lOWA

Grinnsil‘s Drive-lit Laundry
I Cleanerr 0 Commercial Sonic-
IMﬂllrlul Lin-vi Rental Service

FABRIC CARE
SPECIALISTS

Flag Flies on

A student referendum was held M0n~
(lay, May 5th, to determine if the col.
lege American ﬂag could be ﬂown at
half mast for the duration of the war in
Vietnam, expressing the college com<
inunity’s distress that the war continues.
Of 349 students voting, 320 voted in fa~
\ior, 19 againstr However, the referen-
dum was nor the driving rorce behind
the action. Monday morning before the
referendum, Frank Thomas spoke with
president Leggett and he agreed to ﬂy
the flag halt mast. The issue was de-
(ided before the vote was taken.

The ﬂag pole is still greased. not:
men must scale a ladder every morning
(0 raise the flag as the rope is tied ten
feet above the base.

Books, Books, Books

Roger Koenker, Thomas Jackson, and
Douglas Super will share the 1969
Harry I. Worth Prize at Grinneﬂ Col»
lege.

The Worth Prize is annually awarded
to the Grinnell seniors who have ac-
quired the best personal libraries.

Koenker, an economics major, will
receive first prize or $25 worth or books
of his own choosing plus rive volumes
irom the Everyman: Library and tire
volumes irom the Modern Library.

Second prize, $10 worth of books or
the recipients own choosing, will go to
Jackson, an economics major, and
Super a mathematics majori

in

Taxi Tips To Strippers

Be motored to the Des Moines airport
by a liberally educated driver. Free
yourself of the relentless tick or a taxi-
meter. Help pay the Playboy demonstra-
tors‘ public defender, The cost per pas-
senger is a rock bottom, everyonemust~
go M. (slightly more it there is an out-
landish amount of luggage). Call Jim
Rudolph at 65685 and make plans to
your convenience. Also call ii you would
like to drive or loan a car.

it a w

Friars Honor New Members

Ten juniors have heen elected to tho
Friars ior next year. Friars is a sen
ior men’s honorary society whose mem-
bership is hased on scholastic excellence,
leadership, and participation in campus
activities. The Juniors elected were:
Michael Brandon, Thomas Cech (presi-
dent), Daniel Frohardt, Lloyd Gersun,
Bruce Nissen, Donald Peterson, Michael
Schaaiman, Roger Schwartz, Douglas
Toilelsen, and John Zarwan.

 

Friday. May I6. lm

SCARLET AND BLACK

Page Fly.

 

Prof limes drive, hart'tipatory Educaton

Editor‘s Note: This article con-
sists of selections from a report to
the National Science Foundation by
Prof. Robert Voertnran. The report,
which discusses “undergraduate re-
search participation" as an altema—
tive approach to the more conven-
tional course system, heavily re-
ilects experiences in the ACM pro-
gram in Costa Rica.

By ROBERT VDERTMAN
Professor of Economics

The case for intensive research ex~
periences for undergraduates is based
upon recognition that the functional ob-
jective of a college education is to de-
velop a serviceable capacity for con-
tinued learning. The most critical aspect
of an intensive research experience is
its parallel to selfaeducation. Ability to
engage in active learning, to pursue new
knowledge independently of the guid-
ance and i‘emfarcement of a teacher's
personality, is acquired by learning and
practicing a full sequence of the pro-
cess of inquiry,

Research is a term which is used to
cover a wide range'ot types of inqnlry.
It may only mean a search or literature
intended to reveal in an orderly way
the present state of knowledge on a par
ticular problem or phenomenon. It may
encompass a sequence of activities in-
volving primary observations in the
field or observations of an experience of
on experimental order, organization of
the observations. their interpretation or
analysis and preparation of reports. Al-
ternatively, research may consist of the
application of procedures to available
primary data leading to a new lnfer<
ence or meanillg. Nevertreless, all of
these different types of research share
the quality of being active inquiry. Re
search, as active inquiry, necessitates
the exercise of critical judgment in male
ing decisions. It is an active learning
process in which inquiry is conducted
to discover what is not known, and to
attempt to present accurately what has
been discovered. Critical judgment is
required at many points in the process
and the development of this capactity is
decisive in the transition from passive or
directed learning to that form of active
learning which is characteristic of in-
tellectual independence. To set the oper-
ational goal for undergraduate educa-
tion requires that the program of ex-
periences involve the development of
critical judgment essential to intellectual
indepedetrce.

Development of capacity for crltical

judgment is not precluded in the con-
ventional course or classroom pattern
of relationships, but a classroom is not
all efficient social arrangement for this
purpose. Learning experiences in a
classroom setting tend to cluster at the
passive end of the range rather than at
the active end. Students roles in class-
rooms are those of spectators most oi
the time even if the Class is conducted
using a discussion or a recitation fore
mat. In the most common case where
the professor lectures the mles of the
students are essentially passive. It is
sometimes possible for an audience of
students to be prompted into some cre-
ative thought by a skillful] lecturer.
This becomes a more reliable expecta-
tion if the students have already en-
gaged in some independent thought on
the subject. The overwhelming aspect of
all classroom situations, however, is the
presence oi the authority of the teacher
who, as both expert and judge is in con—
trol. Critical judgments about signifi-
cance and meaning even when students
participate in discussion are expected of
the teacher, and this is, of course the
logic of the classroom, or the lecture
hall as an educptional setting.

IMPROVED LEARNING

Beyond the classroom, the extension
oi control or direction by the professor
who is teaching a course may be quite
variable on the scale of passive to active
roles for the students who are taking the
course. The most typical Situation is for
the major decisions to be made by the
professor. Reading selections, usually
Contained ill a textbook or an edited col-
Iection, along with study guides, ques-
tions. problems and the like are handed
out by the professor. It is the mark of
a "good course” that it be well pro-
grammed, and indeed it we take B. F.
Skinner’s experimental evidence ser-
lously (and i do accept most of what he
has reported) a well designed program
can function very eificiently in master-
ing a well—defined body of knowledge.
Here is the essence of the customary cri-
teria for courses: that the learning of
the subject be so well programmed that
students can’t fail to learn. Or, to put. it
another way, a well programmed course
is one in which the way is so well mark-
ed that at each step the learner ls as
sured that he is on the right path (that
is what I understand is meant by posi-
tive reinforcement).

Independent study may be said to lie
at the opposite extreme of the active~to-
passive scale from programmed leam-
ing. True independence implies the task
oi creating a program. independent in-

 

NOTiCE

As in previous years, we will store your

portable iypewriiers for the summer

at no charge. We will have them in-

uteri.

While your portable is in, why not have

us chemically. clean and oil it. and have

It already tat another year at hard

work next year?

@RENNEM OFFIC 5&5?th

Across From The Post Office

quit-y is not simply the absence of a
classroom, bltt the absence of a road
map and a preordained (or professor
ordained) destination. Intellectual inde-
pendence is achieved when an investi-
gator has developed the ability to dectdc
which “authority” is useful; to decide
which eVldence, which procedure.
which hypothesis and which inference Di‘
Conclusion is appropriate to the inquiry.

I believe the gap between dependent
or passive learning and independent in-
quiry to be substantial. We have a vast
and growing number of highly “edu~
cated” people who do not bridge this
gap. While many do make this transition
to intellectual independence, the bridg-
ing is largely left to chance in the sys-
tern of higher learning. The crucial role
oi research participation is to provide
for his transition. As participating ap-
prentices in a research undertaking,
students can be involved in the process
at “cieating a program.” By participat-
ing with the professor in the crltical
judgments which must be made in the
design and conduct of original inquiry
all of the processes of inquiry may be
experienced by the student. This is a
very diilerent activity from retreading
the achieved results of inquiries past and
synthesized into the textbook or the well
taught course. it is, 1 think, a crucial
type of experience in preparation for
intellectual independence,

TEACHING VSi RESEARCH

Scholarly achievement is the para-
mount qualiﬁcation ior holding oihce as
a college faculty member. Creative
scholarship is encouraged and supported
by institutions of higher learning both as
a valid independent function and as a
condition of continuing competence to
teach. A presumption that superior scho«
lurs ate superior teachers is built into
the system of faculty ranks by relating
promotion in the hierarchy oi pay, priv-
ilege and power to evidence of scholar-
ship, and the sciences successful careers
in academia are most apt to reflect re-
search periormance. in short, tlle model
ior the academic bureaucracy is con-
struclcd on a premise of mutual rein-
iorcement of scholarship and teaching.

Operational realities are typically
poorly adjusted to the model, and ten-
sions arising irom conflicts between
teaching and research functions are
sources of continuous and often intense
pressure within the system. “Teaching
loads" are burdens, and those who can
establish claims to superior research
competence, especially by obtaining re
search grants, are most successiul in
shifting their loads to others who are
either less active in research, or at least
at a lower level in the hierarchy. What-
ever the plausibility of the model, the
pressures within the system tend to the
paradoxical result of rewarding schol<
arship with minimum teaching respon-
sibilties and by punishing ineptitude, in<
experience or dedication to teaching with
the bulk of the teaching burden.

Conflict between teaching and re
search is most overtly and seriously a
matter of the allocation of time. Teacllc
lng activities occupy time, and mean-
ings and measurements ascribed to
teaching loads onen stress basic work-
time concepts; class hours. studcnicon-
tactrhours, and the like. Scholarship n1-
so occupies time, and those tensions
which have become serious pressures in-
ternal to academia are most directly re-
flected in these competing claims for
time. Long standing defense of the com-
plementarity of teaching and scholar-
slnp emphasizes the contributions or re-
Search to teaching performance. but the
characteristic problem for the professor
is to arrange for his teaching activi-
ties to contribute to his scholarship.

This non-reinforcement of research from
teaching duties tends to be most marked
at the undergraduate level. Hence, it is
not surprising that a common view of
progress in academics is the shift from
undergraduate to graduate level teach-
ing.

A course. as a program designed to
teach students what the professor alrea-
dy knows, features the behavior of the
professor as the authority. By contrast
a research project places the professor
in the role of inquirel'.

In the authority role when he ls asking
questions, they are understood to be
rhetorical. When he is a scientist Iead<
ing a research team he is asking ques-
tions which do not yet have answers.
These two styles of behavior are quite
different. Students continuously observe
and respond to professional behavior
models, and the model or the professor
as inquirer ls surely an excellent one
to have in full View. This exposure is
apt to be most clear alld useful if stu.
dents are accepted as genuine collabor«
ators in the research. As collaborators
they can, and Will engage in discussions
of strategies and methods for the in<
vesttgatiore. They will welcome involve-
ment in making critt’cal judgments of
alternative courses of action. Questions
which are discussed in this relationship
are not those designed simply to test:
the understanding of the statements. but
questions which are open in the mind
of the professor; questions for which he
is seeking answers.

This shift in role from authority to
Inquirer also modifies the order of pref~
crences in interacting with students as
co-researchers. Lecturing becomes a less
fruitful activity in ’ this relationship.
While the teacher. as scientist, must
still exercise final judgment in the pro-
gramming of research, the experiences
of students as rescal‘ch associates be-
come essential information in this pro-
cess. What studenc say becomes in-
teresting and useful and listening is
made easy. Conversations become au-
thentic exchanges. Specific information
supplied by students in the form of
written reports, data schedules and the
like are read with interest. The process
of criticism and evaluation of students'
works has the vital purpose of improv-
ing performance relative to the success
of the inquiry, Errors are no longer the
stuff from which poor marks are fash-
ioned. Rather. the effort toward Cloris
fication of the Source of difficulty of
misunderstanding takes clear proce-
dence over “grading." Grade A per-
formances by the entire “class" may not
be realized, but this is obviously an at.
tractive functional goal. Professional de-
tachment or disengagement in the face
of “failure" turns out to be a much less
acceptable posture.

DISCOVER WORKAELE PROJECTS
FOR RESEARCH PARTICIPATION

While it does not seem to me that
there is a single or best formula. there
are some guidelines for the identification
oi projects suitable to the intellectual col-
laboration of undergraduates and profes<
sors which I have Called research parti-
cipation. It is critical that the activities
of students not be limited simply to per-
formance of routine precedures, but ex-
tended to include analysis, interpretation
and the writing of reports. Nevertheless,
the most obviously suitable projects are
those which do involve the collection of
primary data from either iield observa-
tions or laboratory experiments. Simi-
larly suitable projects may be based up-
on examination, organization and analy-
sis of information contained in statisti-
cal collections, historlcal documents,

EDUCATION—
(Continued on Page ii)

 

Page Six

> Education

(Contiued from Page 5)

ethnographies or tield monographs. The
traits oi such projects are (1) that they
involve multiple levels of sophistication
in the activities which comprise the re-
search, ranging from relatively routine
procedures to complex manipulations of
intormation (applying principles of inter-
ence and constructing hypotheses); and
(2) that the scope tends to be relatively
elastic; permitting participation by vary-
ing numbers of students, or allowi g
variable time commitments tor partici-
pants in a project

Plausible subjects for investigation are
not identified in terms of some level of
preparation of studenm. Substantial in-
quiry at all oi the irontiers of knowledge
requires investigation at many levels of
professional competence or sophistica-
tion. Adequate preparation for making
observations, conducting interviews, or-
ganizing data, operating equipment, in-
cluding data processing equipment, and
other procedures can be acquired very
quickly. Study of the “layers” of litera<
ture bearing on the research subject and
on methods of investigation can be com-
bined with the specific collection and
analysis processes of the research Pro
gress, irom initial levels or preparation
to more advanced levels of understand-
ing, then, is more critical than the start-
ing level. Research participation, as con-
trasted with independent Study, permits
students to observe and interact with
other students and with the proiessor
(or protessors) who are asking their own
questions and may be employing other
means of inquiry. Undergraduate stu-
dents may not achieve levels oi syn-
thesis or of invention in theory that one
may expect of PhD candidates, but very
high levels at understanding of design
of inquiry, oi methodology, and of the
relevance of theory and its limitations
can be achieved. Moreover, undergradu-
ates stretch to be respected associates
ill the undertaking
Brief Notes on Student Values and

MOTIVATIONS

Up to now I have been concerned With
questions in the philosophy of education
in general, and with an examination or
perspectives on the behavior of the fac-
ulty in relationship to educational goals.
The point or view has essentially been
that of “the establishment," of the eld-
ers or academia discussing the proper
education of the younger generation.
We have the power, even though it is
being challenged by the students, to de-
sign the programs, to set the standards
and to legitimate the perlormances of
Students with grades, Certificates and
diplomas Much of what we do is judi-
clal in character. Mindtul or our respon—
sibility to sort the young into appro-
priate classes in respect to the positions
we find them fitted for, we are often
more attentive to the problems or test-
ing and grading than to the problems
oi learning. We never really separate
leaching lrom testing (we either test
for what we teach, at leach for What
is to be tested, if the testing is beyond
our control). Now this is by way of in-
troducing the correct student view of
“the establishment.” Students do not,
as a rule, misunderstand the academic
process. it is primarily a game to be
played for the prizes — the grades, the
credits, the diplomas and the status. It
is also a game to be played by the rules
— more or less — which speciry that a
student must figure out how to Score
with each professor-judge. students
place dittering values on the choices
between points and what you must do
to earn the points. Some of these choices
reflect the ease or difficulty of the
plays, but many of the choices retlcct
the enjoyment or else the distaste of the
plays. Whatever vol 5 students may
ultimately place on l educations,

SCARLET AND BLACK

they understand that the establishment
respects those students who scorer They
also will state, almost universally, that
there are irequeiit and serious discrep-
ancies between scoring and learning.
Operationally, then, the academic status
or achievement to participation in the
game, to discovery of suitable modes of
play in order to score. Faith that aca-
demic achievement is generally COnSiS‘
tent with learning is widely held in the
society, except by students. They be-
lieve that it is only sometimes the case
that the record is an accurate reflection
of learning. Once they have completed
the process they will tend to forget the
intensity of their doubts and become
reconciled to the view that since they
are certified they must be educated.

Why is college such a chore for so
many? Why is it not exciting and pleas-
urable; its own reward? To a large ex-
tent the answer is that it's a bore. As
standards have been raised and compev
tition has become more intense even
more time is spent in dull tasks and
tensions are increased. Learning. of
course, is exciting and pleasurable, but
the game being played is not by any
means uniformly a learning game.
Even for the brightest students with the
gieatest faith in the system, many
courses turn out to be dull and unre-
warding tasks. Hostility toward areas of
knowledge, which becomes an antlrintel-
lectiial set, is trequently generated by
the failure of alignment between playing
the game according to the rules and be-
come interested in the game beyond
the compulsion to score,

EDUCATIONAL EFFICIENCY

The usual defenses of the prevalling
order do not stand on its merits as a
promoter of intellectual independence
and a nurturer of curiosity and creativ-
ily. Detense oi the system, and etiorts
toward its retorm are geared to maxi-
mum absorption ot revealed truth at
the least cost per student, Most of the
increases In academic Costs have
stemmed from the bargaining power of
the taculty members to provide theme
selves with increased opportunities or
treedoms tor inquiry. This is, in itseli,
a clearly worthwhile gain, but at least
some of the burden of these gains have
come to rest on the students in the
form of a growing depersonalization,
and mechanization of the educational
machinery,

Colleges and universities can only as-
sist students to leam, and learn how
to learn, by providing the students with
a suitable set or connections with a com-
nlunity of professors who are engaged
in the callings of scholarship. The ma-
jor questions I have raised heie have
to do with the suitability of these con-
nections and the importance of serious
egtperimentatinn in new modes of rela-
tionships between students and faculty
which promote the scholarship of the
faculty and at the same time provide a
very ditterent set of opportunities tor
students to become intellectually inde
pendent. Research participation can, as
I have suggested, operate with quite
authoritarian and restrictive patterns in
the relationships or apprentices to mas-
ters. I think this is a serious problem,
but not really as serious as the weight
at such patterns under present arrange-
ments. AS I have tried to point out, the
posture and behavior of the academic
us investigator is essentially a diiierent
one than in his position as a classroom
teacher under Conventional arrange-
ments. Students’ connections with pro-
fessors can be, I think, even more sup-
portivo of students’ genuine curiosity
and their desires to be recognized as ac
tive explorers in a research participa-
tion relationship than is usually attorded
in a course program The stretch to al-
low E most efficient alignment of the
students’ independent interests with the
research interests or the prolessors does
depend both on the scope and character
of research project design and upon a
set of responsible negotiations concern.
ing the limits of freedom of choice of in-
q.ry within which the protessor will
offer his aid and guidance,

The question of efficiency in promot-
ing inquiry as opposed to programming
knowledge must be explored. I do not,
on the face of it, think that what is pro»
posed here is inherently more costly
per student than many present arrange-
ments for education. What I have called
research participation can be explored
at many levels of interaction between
students and iaculty, and the experi-
mentation Inward major modification in
educational policy will, 1 think, provide
some guidance as to costs. The most
serious difficulties, however, are not the
costs but the pains oi reorienting eii-
trenched perspectives as to what educa-
tion is about and how it is to be done
in our time.

 

Do You Feel Like
Things Are Getting

TAKE A BREAK WITH US!

Still 20 Minutes
From Phone Tol Pizza

moon's PEZZA

TOM 8r BETTE GAREISON

236-5222

May is. not]

Fifth Your Program
Ignorance or Apathy?

By SUSAN HUNT

The small number of applicant! if)!
this years Fifth Year Ahmad Program
suggests a general ignorance as to til)
existence or function of the progrb
Annually the International Studies Co
mlttee establishes contacts with to
sign schools who express interest in of
ering a graduating Grinnell senior b
one-year teaching position.

This year the committee matched the
qualifications and interests or three ren-
iors to the specifications listed by three
lorelgn schools and allocated lunds for
the students round trip transportation.
Kaye Handford begins her work as on
English tutor and church organist Jun.
20th at Ahmednagar College, a non do.
nominational Christian school near Home
bay, lndia. Beginning in September, so.
san Hunt will serve as an assistant in
the music department at American Col:
lege for Girls in lstanbul, Turkey. .Iané
Parlsh will teach conversational English
at Lingman College in Hong Kong begin»
ning in late August.

The definite assignments of students to
varied positions in Istanbul Hong Kong
and Bombay raise the question as to
why more Grinnell seniors don’t apc
ply for such an opportunity. Is it that
students are unaware of the existence
of the Fifth Year Abroad Program or
does their apparent lack of interest sug—
gest a questioning of the aims of such a
program? The gradual decline oi the in.
lemational Relations Club, which served
as the coordinate student group for the
international Studies Committee, may be
responsible {or the lack of student pro-
motlon at and subsequent participation in
the program over the last few yearst
last year no qualified students applied,
and two years ago only two students
were selected as participants (compared
to eight chosen in l958). If, however, the
aims of the program are in question,
then their clarification should proceed a
continuation of the program. it the activ-
hues of the committee don't allow them
sufficient time to completely review the
Fifth Year Abroad Program, then per-
haps a director of the program in Off-
Campus Study, as proposed by the
navenman report, could undertake such
a project.

Grad Week Planned

Graduation activities for this year are
different irom years past. Students do
not have to attend Commencement to
receive their diplomas, and Baccalau-
reate is not as traditional as before.

At the Commencement services, for-
mer governor and U.S. Senator Harold
nughes will present the address and re-
cieve an honorary Doctor oi Law de-
gree. Others to receive honorary degrees
are: John Chapman, ’24. editor of the
Harvard Business Review, Dring Need<
ham, ’14, “distinguished jurist” from Des
Moines, and James Stauss, ’36, retiring
Dean of the College, all Doctors of Law;
Roger Loveland, '19, former Photo Mi.
cmgraphy expert lor Eastman Kodak,
Doctor of Science; and Philip Hallie, ’44,
protessor of philosophy at Wesleyan u.,
and Curtis Tarr, retiring president of
Lawrence, Doctors of Humane Letters.

Other activities slated for Commence-
ment week include a Senior party Tues~
day night, a Senior dinner Wednesday at
which the President's medalist will b.
announced, a “compromise" Bacca~
laureate service Thursday at which Mol~
ly Malcolm, Kathy Karlsen, and Hubert
Farbes will give their responses to tho
Grinnell College presented in the cata-
logue, and an Alumnae dinner Friday

GRADUATION—
gContinurd Page lo Co,lumn 3)

 

- ~uw“ "

hid-y. May is, I969

Wait For Action From Above

Blacks Meet with Trustees

By TED GLICK

For the past lew months the
CBS and the administration
have been working to improve
conditions at Grinnell for black
students. Last weekend, at. a
Trustees meeting in Chicago,
several black students presented
an outline of the innovations and
improvements they would like
to see at Grinnell, and repre—
sentatives of the administration
presented a position paper out-
lining their ideas for making
this institution present a worth—
while educational experience for

its black students. Subsequently,
the position paper or the admin-
istration was, lor all practi~
cal purposes, thrown out, and
the outline of the blacks was
accepted by the Trustees as
the base on which to build a
resolution to be voted on at the
Trustees meeting in June.

The action of last weekend
grew out of the Trustees’ March
meeting. At that meeting a
group of Grinnell black stu-
dents, administration members,
and former Grinnell students
met before the Standing Com»
mittee an Educational Policy ol

 

l. ripe broken?

No, Yin trying to ﬁnd
where l stashed roms dough

2. That’s where you keep
your money?

Sometimes I put it in
the ﬂower pot.

4. But that‘s what you're
doing now.

Not quite. The beauty
of nly system n that

1 usually can’t ﬁnd
where I put it.

J

3. What's wrong with the bank?

i'd only lake it right
out again,

sum

6. I think you'd he a lot better
oii putting some oi your
dough into Living insurance
irom Equitable. It not only
gives you and the tnmrly

ou'ro going to have a
iehnre of rotcction,
it also buil 5 cash value:
you can use ior emergencies,
opportunities, or even
retirement.

lwonder if it could he
with the irrnch fries?

For lnlormal‘lon Ihout Living Insurance, lot: The Man from E ullable.
For career opportunities at Equiluble, see your Placement 0 'cer, ad
wrilei Lionel M. Stevens, Manager, College Employment.

THE ﬁEQUITABLE

Thu Equitable Lite Assurance Socmly ot (h: United stain
1255 Atomic oi the Amcricns, Nuv York, New York lotus
An Equal Upyoriuluty minnow, M/F _ D Equitable ilIOl

SCARLET AND BLACK

the Trustees and presented their
case for a more relevant pro-
gram tor blacks. This led to a
meeting before the entire Board
of Trustees later that night at
which [he turmat [or last week.
end's meeting was decided on.

At the June meeting of the
Board of Trustees a committee
of the Trustees will present 8
resolution concerning-the chang<
es desired by blocks for the en<
tire Board to vote on, Also, the
Board will consider possible
Contributions and financial as-
sistance for the setting-up and
operating of the new programs.

There are seven general area!
which the CBS would like to
see improved, expanded and/or
initiated. These are: (l) It
means for students needing pre-
oollege educational enrichment
to receive it; (2) provisions [or
increased admission of blacks
and an increase in scholarship
assistance; (3) an increase in
the number of black faculty
members; (i) an expansion or
curricular opportunities, such
as a Black Studies department;
(5) provisions for more money
for more Black Cultural events;
(5) establishment of a Black
Student Cenler, such as an oil'-
eampus house, which will also
be open to whites; and (7) an
improvement in the placement
oiiice so as to provide more in-
formation on meaningful job
opportunities for ‘hlaclts once
they enter the real world.

Further information on the
specifics of these general pro-
grams was unavailable item the
Students who were at the Chi-
cago meeting. Greg Coggs said,
“I’m not going to make a com-
merit until the President makes
a statement. It's up to the Ma
ministration and the Trustees to
act.”

Along with the meeting with
the Tmstees, there has been
other activrty on the issue of
educational improvement tar
blacks. Mr. Joe Wall, luturo
Dean of the College, and Mer-
ryll Penson of CBS traveled to
Atlanta on Monday and Tiles-
day. While there they talked to
students and faculty at More—
house, Spellmau. Clark, and
Morris Brown colleges, all of
them predominantly black in-
nitiltions. They explored the
possibilities of having faculty
members frt J these schools
spending time as visiting pro~
tessors at Grinncll, oi having an
exchange of faculty members
between schools, and of having
an exchange of students be-
tween schools.

The idea for thls expedition
grew out of IWO sources: First,
Mr. Charles Cleaver, on leave
trom Grinnell and working at
Morehouse College, a black
graduate school which is devel-
oping a graduate program in
Black Studies, ,believed .that
such exchanges would be bene-
ficial and educational. Secondly,
Hugh Gloster, president or
Morehouse, visited Griimell in
February and spoke to various
iacuity members and adminis-
lration ofﬁclals. From these
two interrelated events, Ihe idea
for exchanges grew and began
to be acted upon.

Miss Penson, in speaking or
her experiences with students,
said Ihat the Students at Clark
and Morris Brown seemed in-
terested in the idea. but the
students at Morehouse and
Spellnian received the idea in a
manner less than encouraging.

Tl Faculty to Leave

Page Sivan

Faculty Fa alities

As of this week, twenty-one
faculty members, excluding the
Lenox Quartet, are not planning
to return to Grinnell. Also, Dr.
Norton, who has been on the
faculty since 1930, will be re-
tiring, although he will teach
one more course next semester.
And Dr. Dawson will be resign-
ing in order to go to Africa, al-
though he does plan to even<
tually return to Grinnell.

There are approximately 125
faculty members, of which half
have only been here since 1965.
This year there were six facul-
ty members who were original—
1y appointed in 1965, nine who
came here in 1966, 19 from 1967,
and 27 new taoulty members.
This does not include the Assist-
ants and Mike Finley, who is
lnstnictor in Religious Studies.
as well as being a Resident Ad-
visor. It is interesting to note
that all the full professors, be-
sides President Leggett and
Lieutenant Colonel Steger, were
hired prior to the fall of 1969.
It should be pointed out that ap-
proximately the Sallie number
of faculty (18), left last year as
will be leaving this year.

There are at present, sixteen
faculty members who are plan»
illng to take a leave of absence
next year for at least one se»
mester. This, Combined With
particular iaculty departures, is
creating Somewhat of a prob-
lem for a iew departments. For
example, this year’s entire Rus-
sian Department is leaving,
(Barasch and Young). The Psy-
chology Department will be los—
ing three members, although
Dr. Tyler will be returning.
With such a small department
this will continue the tremen—
dous turn-overrrate problem.
(There is only one other person
on the staff, Mr. Gerritz, who
was new this year.

Physics will also be missing
three of its members, at least
tor the iirst semester, (Bow-
man, Gale and Hanson). The
Classical Languages Depart-
ment will be reduced by one
third as Crossett and McKibhen
take consecutive one semester
leaves. The struggling Art De
partment has not yet tound a
replacement for McMillan, al»
though it has hired someone to
replace Morse. And iinally, the
Anthropology Department has
not been able to replace Mr.
Willis.

Faculty not returning men:
(The numbers in the parenthesis
indicate the ﬁrst year they
came here)

Barasch (’67) Russian—ill N.

Classiﬁed Ads

E

WILL BUY electric guitar from

ﬂdy student, Call 236-3022.

WANTED: Girls' bicycle. Call
236.4874.

Wm WHOEVER took the
light green dress out or the
Main 4th hall closet between
May 2nd and 5th please re-
turn it? No questions will be
asked. The dress is a short
one, with ruffles on the neck,
sleeves, and tront, and it has
is wide dark-green belt. Size:
13.14, The dress is part or a
bridesmaids outtit and i need
it ior a wedding on May 24th.
Please just put it back in the
closet from which you took it.

Marilyn Brookens

‘1. city tinishing his dissertae
tion.

Cagle ('57) Phllcsophy~teachr
ing at the University or indi-
ana in Bloomington.

Dawson ('57) Economics-gain;
to Africa (see text).

Donovan ('68) Psychology (one
year program) — raising a
family.

Hanson ('56) Physlcs — Chaln
man of U. at Northern lowa
Physics department in Cedar
Falls.

Harrington ('68) Political SCl~
ence (one year program).

Fennell (’68) Math

Matthews (spring '68) Theater~
working near Atlanta, Ga.

McMillan (’60) Art — Chairman
or the Art Department at the
University of Arizona in Tuc<
son.

Morse (’66) Art — does not have
a job, but will work on his
art in Portland, Oregon.

Murphy ('67) Education~teacli
at St. Mary's College, Winona.
Minn.

Norton ('30) History — relirini
(see text).

Parsell (’67) French—teach at
Flirman U., in Gi‘eenville, S.C.

Parzen ('67) Biology — Consid-
ering doing post-doctoral world
at the University of WISC., in
Madison.

Platt ('67) Math — attending
graduate school at the Univer.
sity of Iowa, in Iowa City.

Purdom (’65) Aerospace Studlel
—involved in national develop.
ment of ROTC at Montgoms
ely, Ala.

Schwartz (’67) Economics -— in
the ACM Field Program in

San Jose, Costa Rica but will
not return.

Skinner (’68) Spanish — teach.
ing at ii, oi lowa, in rows
City.

Taylor (’68) Biology — will
marry David Harris and live
in Atlanta, Ga.

Willis ('67) Anthropology —
teach at Western Michigan U.,
in Kalamazoo.

Young ('66) Russian — teaching
at Dartmouth, in Hanover,
N.H.

Zimmar ('65) Psychology —
teaching at [he all-girls Briar
Cliff College in Westchester,
N.Y.

Zitner (’57) English (Carter-
Adams Prolessor of English)
—teaching at University or
Toronto.

Lenox Quartet: Hersh ('62),
Marsh (’62), McCall (’62),
Pettys (’65) Music — Quartet-
in-l‘esldence at State Univer-
sity oi New York in Bingham.
ton.

Leaves 1969-70
Bowman ('67) Physics—lot
semester, Burma ('41) Sociol-
ngy—year, Fishman (’48) Bit»
logy — year, Gale ('25) Physics

— year, Haner ('47) Psychology

— year, i-iaveman (’62) Econo-

mics — year, Howe (’56) Music

— year, Kintner ('64) History—

year, Kissane ('56) English —

year, Maggee ('62) Political Sci-r
ence — year, McKibtren ('52)

Classical Languages — semes-

ter, Crossett ('53) Classical

Languages — lst semester,

Mendoza ('43) Biology — year,

0elke ('31) Chemistry — year,

Pollack ('65) Economics-year.

Smith ('34) Music — lst Semen-

ler.

 

Page Eighf

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. May lb, was

 

Report From Your Local Carpetbagger

By CHARLES F. CLEAVER
Professor of English

Since the earlier days ol Reconstinc-
tion, it has been customary lor us Car-
petbaggers to report back, periodical-
ly, to the eleemosynary institutions in
the North from which we derive our
spiritual support. This report can be
brief, Earlier theoreticians of this
movement, such as Sumner, Stevens
and Julian, understood that it would not
be complete until the whole fabric of
this society were reconstructed. They
were unsuccessful during their lives

and, after two months, I have been un—
nuccessiul, too.

NOT CHEERFUL

It would be possible to be more cheer-
ful it i reported on certain things I have
seen. The neighborhood I live in is
pleasant, middle-class, rather well in-
tegrated, and free of “For Sale” Signsi
My daughter's 7th grade class is bal-
anced 5on1 — for the present. More-
liouse College is the best I have ever
seen, it you use one fair measure ~<
that is, if you look at; the acaderinlo
skills of freshmen and seniors, and
measuring the amazing improvement.
Atlanta itself has forced me to rear-
range my Yankee stereotypes l have
heard several times that poor people in
the country around here no longer talk
to one another of heading north to New
york or Chicago — they now say, we‘ll
go, when we can, to Atlanta or Houston,

Encouragement about the state or
Reconstruction must end about there.
'Atlanta, mostly, is still segregated and
discriminatory. Integrated housing or
schooling is very rare. Morehouse is
splendid by the standard I have men-
tioned, and very good by any standard,
but one’s excitement about the skills of
the seniors is dampened by noticing
how many students fall out along the

way. Furthermore, the lower education-
al standards of the entire South, black
or white, elementary through graduate
school. affects the quality of like here
in every way. Compare TV films of the
Georgia and Iowa legislatures in action,
and the latter looks like Conservations
among the Virtuous Pagans in that book
you have read. Many Atlantans have
laudable ambitions about Culture, and
have built a grand building to house it
in. But it houses second-rate paintings
by lirst rate painters, and opened its
season of the drama with a vehicle star‘-
ring June Havoc. As I say, though. it's
better than I had expected.

COUNTRYSIDE BLEAK

Then, however, there's the rest or
the South. Take a road out of town, and
at the edge or it e ZAP! — it becomes
Georgia, just like that. Red soil and
scrubby lobiollylng pines; dirty, sullen,
gabrslation attendants whose hands
might wield a murderous chain; and,
in restaurants, the whiny, daffy voices
of Daughters or the Confederacy citat-
tering on about the Nigras.

As I say, We not been able to change
those things. r'request that I not be re-
called to Grinnell just yet, however. All
I’ve Contributed t0 the Reconstruction of
the South is 325 towards an academic
building, but the business or being here
has contributed somewhat to the re-
oonstruction of me. Let me give some
examples.

A pious homily may sometimes be
heard during certain social situations,
as when a professor visits a maiden
aunt: “Oh, yes, it’s lovely work —~ I
learn more from the students than they
learn from me," Now, it I were forced
to scrutinize this common saying in the
bright sunlight of truth I would be
forced to say that it doesn‘t always
hold up as a revelation of unalloyed
fact. It’s true of my work here, how-
ever. I would feel obliged to avert my

 

What's So Special About
King's Food Host U.S.A.?

Let’s

Call It

Atmosphere . . .

We believe ihei dining out should be a
totally pleasant experience. So we provide
bright. attractive surroundings and quality
background music. And. horn ihe car serv-
ice shes ouisicie to the china and silver-
were inside. every King's location ir kept
scrupulously clean.

BEYMER‘S

King's Food Host USA.

eyes when cashing my paycheck it it
weren't for the fact that it’s only fed<
eral money, and not tuition money,

WORD MEANING CLARIFIED

Among other things, I have learned
some new meanings lor words. A dlc<
tiunary or American English ought to
list all meanings ol words in our cul—
ture. but it doesn't. All Grinnell readers
could supply deﬁnitions that a black
American might Suggest ior such words
and phrases as ”law and order," “the
liberal tradition,” and “American his
tut’y." Here are some harder ones “7
and onehali percent interest" means
“we were only kidding about black capi-
tulism." “Morley" means “everything,"
or so a group of students agreed one
evening; an aging white professor
might explain to a white student that
this is not so, since that student has lots
more gonig for him; does he deliver
the same kindly sermon to a black stu~
dent? “Birth Control” means “a con-
splracy among white people who have
noticed our high birth rate" (I don't
vouch for the objective accuracy oi
these meanings — only the subjective).
‘(Famiiyw' ipit's defined as an arrange<
hient [or the protection of the vulnerable
young, what will a black parent say to
his children about this definition?

LEARNS MUCH

The Atlanta University Center has ad~
Vanced my education in another way,
as well. r think about social change
down here in a less categorical way. A
student warned me before I came that
these were Negro colleges, not black
colleges. Sure enough, Martin Luther
King, Jr., and his Christian ideas about
winning change, are very much alive in
his alma mater. But so is W.E.Bi Du-
bois, who muttered inaudibly, when it
came his turn to open faculty meeting
with prayers. Sure enough, the More-
house College newspaper complains,
that many at the students seem hell-
bent for the bourgeoisie; but do they
make it really clear to us that green
power is not a help? This being an in-
stitution Di higher learning, it husbands
a very Wide range or opinions and goals,
including a good many that are hard to
classiiy by sect or party, Also, it be-
gins to seem to me impossible to ac
cept the abrogation by certain sects or
the word ”militant." I have discovered
nothing patsy about many or the SCLC
leaders I have heard, and would ad-
vise nobody to be in any hurry to de-

clare that outfit dead. Some older teach.
ers here point out, among many other
things, that old students or Dubois
learned many decades ago that black is
beautii‘ul. I find that heroes come in
many shapes and forms 1 hadn't rec-
ognized, but otherwise, needless to Say,
I don't judge. 1 don't have much prac<
tice in running a revolution, and many
people here, very young and very old.
do.

Some kinds of conversations joln these
motions. Many older pmiesors came
here when liberal Yankee institutions
were at the opinion that Harvard or
Chicago Pli.D’s didn’t quite qualify them
for employment. Now these same instiv
’tutions are oiiering them outlandish
wages, and the men concerned are de-
veloping an uproarious folklore of puts
downs — who did you turn down last:
week, and [or how much? They stay
here not just because they are bitter,
and not usually because they’re sepa-
rutisls, but because they can communi-
cate their skills to more of their
brothers, i guess that leaves a place
like Grinnell pretty much where Prm
lessor Harding. of this Center, says we
should bet largely dependent upon ex<
changes until the supply of black
Phil's improves, and at least reflec<
tlve about our temptations to take up
piracy. (Morehouse, incidentally, is in
about the same shape Grinnell is: its
students want more black professors,

too.)
RECRUITING IRONY

Here‘s another conversion that join:
disparate voices: isn't it ironic that
places like Emory and Duke, that:
wouldn’t let a Negro ”darken” their,
doors rive years ago. or even places
like Harvard and Cornell University
who happened onto virtue only slightly
enriier (and then almost always virtue
lay in spotting the agility of a halfback)
are getting astronomical grants irom
tho Feds and irorn the toundatlons for
seeking out. and matriculating a small
number of black students, while €014
leges like these that have been at the
work for a century, on precarious and
pitiful budgets, and with astounding suc-
cess with large numbers of students, get
peanuts? and at the same time are hurt
badly in their own recruiting?

i’m not sure how much you Yankees
up there are lousing up our Recon-
struction down here. If any major breaks
through occur here though, 1']! report
again, airmail,

 

“Not All That Men Desire Do They Obtain"

wHousman

| with to .xpieii my gratitude to "tore student: who volunteered to dry it
the ilugpoi. with one tor me during th. courso ot . week. I never asked them
why they we.» doing what they were doing, a; they did not ask me. or tome
actions it i: Micro and important to tooth. in skuiinaiion from the deer.

Small hmnmi a: well .i great deserva their do. ma ot glory. and in l
cito lhs names or those who participated in the adioni Th. hours — (mm b a.m.
to early evening — won. long; tho tempuiaiui. wit uncn bitter cold; and isms.
timer it rained out no one tailed to come upon his reitsppuiuisd hour.

LYNN ADAMS
SUZANNE aowelzs
DAVID DECKER
CONSTANCE Ei'iICSON

HARRY FULTON
LLOYD GERSON
JANET LANDIS

ClNDr PAULSON

MARY PFISTER
ELEONORE SPlEGEL
DONALD STUMP
SHARON VANDERJAGT

Acknowledgement is do. others as weilt rims. who brought cup: or waiert
those so the «at; at Building: umi Grounds who worked to ropair the acts at
vandalism done to the ﬂagpole and or haiyards: those who wniie letters at en-
auragement (all tits lull.“ were at this kindl; those who name to talk and stayed
past :uriosi'ty'. than who smiled pleasantly .na said "Hello" is they pissed. and
who glanced upward in some kmii of curious respect is. the ting; thorn who
smiled wtyiy and with ironic understanding: those who looked partly askallco and

peiily in gentle bewilderment.

To those who sworn as me and viliﬁed me i tender my pity,- many who
never ieumi iint that “communication" and "riiiiogu." which int-y have said
they longed tor, but those who swine and walked away resenttuily ion rush union
or mind and spirit. If they change and wish in talk, i shall. at coins. ml a.

ways. in available.

“I Lell‘ . . . For As Good A Reason Asl We-niI . . . "

_.Thoreau

JOHN CROSSETT

 

Friday. May to. 1959

SCARLET AND BLACK

 

The 5&3 Reviews

Porlney's Complaint

Trumped Up Popularity

By GARY GlDDENS

Portney’s Complaint is worth reading
in spite of its popularity, but it is not
the great literature that so many speed-
freak Critics have tried to trump it up as.

Briefly, Purtney‘s Complaint is basical-
ly a bad case at third generation Amer
lean Jewery. Alexander Penney is a
grotesque stereotype living in n worltl
oi grotesque stereotypes; the overhear
ing, castratlng mother, the constipated
father, pleasant but stupid goyim, etc.
His story is related as a coniesslon to n
psychiatrist whose only response is the
exasperated “punch line” of the book.
“So, Now vee may perhaps to begin.
,Yes?” i

Portney ls in serch or an identity —
"Put the id back in yid" is his anguished
plea —— to help him survive in America
with all those crazy gentiles who say
“Good morning” in the morning, “Good
litter-noon” in the afternoon, and who are
apparently never obsessed by the tunky
perversities of sex, masturbation, defeca-
tion, loss of temper, or lack of reserve.
But Roth doesn't seem to be sure how
sick his protagonist really is. The pas-
sages allemate from stereotype confron-
tations in wildly hilarious sex episodes
and gentile-Jew interrreactions. to des-
perate cries of hurt and bewilderment.
As a result, the reader often ﬁnds the
laughter sticking in his throat, although
the structure or the book seems to decry
the seriousness of the oomplaint. When-
ever Portney gets too serious, Roth
checks himself and throws in another
anecdote about his sex adventures with
his girl irlend, “the monkey." And to
be sure, these segments contain some
brilliantly written wmic moments. But:
the repetitive rambling oi the “contes-
sion” is olten merely redundant rather
than revealing. There is an ease or style
and perceptiveness that ls reminiscent
of Roth at his best (the “Goodbye C0-
lumbus" stories) but i don't believe that
Roth is at home in the novel formi The
discipline or a novella might have avoid-
ed the ﬂuctuation oi tone and the mean-
ingless repetition, and would have creat-
ed a tighter, runnler framework. But of
course novella: and short stories never,
ever make the bestsellers list,

The novel is significant for a couple of
reasons. For the lirst time e excepting
a few short stories by Roth and Malamud
— the Gregor Samsa-Asa Leventhal char»
acter has become a joke. (How else do
you treat such a cliche at this late date?)
The narrative style is that uniquely A~
merican vemacular that seems to have
been modllied year alter year ever since
Nick Carraway hit town. Most impor-
tant, however, IS the possibility that
Roth has sung the swan song tor a type
of Jewish literature that has dnminated
American letters tor twenty-two years.
I don't believe much can be added to the
serious attempts at this kind of writing
alter Herzog, and Roth has completely
run the stereotype into the ground —
creating a grand quignol at Jewish
ideals.

There is truth in the antics of Alexan-
der Partney, and thls is a marvelously
entertaining and timely story but it is ul-
timately dissappointing.

:—

Equipment Lost!

Over $l,000 worth or equipment in~
clnding a Hohner electric piano, a vox
Super Beatle speaker system, and two
vox organ loot pedals are missing. Any
assistance in locating the equipment
would be very appreciated. Contac wa
Wah, Ext. 643, Loose Hall,

Fantastic Faculty Art

By RICHARD WICKSTROM

The Faculty Exhibition at Schealler
Gallery showing through June 2nd is by
far the most exciting exhibition 1 can
remember seeing at Grinnell. Not only
are the individual pieces excellent, but:
the organization and hanging or the
works transforms the gallery into a dec«
oratlve, cohesive environment. Many
changes in style from last year are evi-
tlélit in the Work of Bart Mulse, Richard
Cervene, and Glenn Zirkle.

Bart Morse's concern last year was
the study or the nude lignre, The town
countryside has gained preeminence in
his explorations this year. The works
Summer: Blue Point and Fall: Blue
Point capture well the mood of each
season. in both works a birds-eye View
presents the eye with the expansive
openness ot Iowa. In Summer: Blue
Point, a wood cut, intense retls, yellows,
greens, and blues term a decorative
interplay or advancing and receeding
areas. The grainy quality at the wood is
exploited in the fluid quality of the
clouds. In Fall: Blue PoinILan etching.
aquatine. the lack of color, energetic
sky, and rich landscape elicit romantic
memories of fall.

()va a weaving by Laura Wleman
brings the viewer directly into the act of
creation through the evemhanging opti-
cal impressions on the retina of the ey t
It is an interesting extension of the 0p
art phenomenon. lier Weaving, Road-
side, which incorporates weeds directly
into the fabric an extension of the col-
logeassemblage tradition, calls up, with
the aid ot warm browns, images at
landscape Weaving, too seldom seen in

 

 

 

 

 

 

BUBA
An exhibit by
Lawrence Frank
East Street Gallery
New lhl'u June 1.

Step Up To

JD'S RESIAURANI’

711% Main
Mon. s Sat. 5 to to p. .
Sunday — Noon to to pm,

an exhibition, is a valuable contribution
to this month’s Show.

The paintings of Richard Cervene rep—
resent an aspect of the recent: trend or
shaped cam/asses. In his work Anguilla
the frame is set back about one half
inch from the surface of the canvas. A5
in most of Cervenc’s work, form is sac-
rlilced to an exploration ot color etlecls.
Advancing and receeding hues or pink
and blue present an interesting spatial
interplay; while aicas where one color
blends into another establishes unusual
coloislic ellects. in his Pnerio Marquez
the canvas jumps a lull six inches out
{lﬂm the Wall, Willlin the blue form on
the front side are beautiful Washes
variations of color. Form, a greater con-
cern in this work, serves the function
of integrating the five surfaces of the
painting. The orange and core lines lead
the eye to the side surfaces where the
downward movement of the pinks on the
left side draw the eye to the bottom sur-
face where the blue stripe offers a plea-
sant visual surprise.

The paintings of Robert McMillan,
largely monochromatic, have an empha»
sis on values and interplay of lorms, In
hls Untitled acrylic in the east lobby,
McMillan employs Cubist space and form
but introduces color to create lurther
spatial movements. The Work is more
dynamic, complex. and imposing than
his other paintingsi His pencil drawings
are pristine, like little gems, complete
unto themselves.

The wine cups of Glenn le‘kle are ex~
nmples or superior design and crafts-
manship — to say more is difficult. The
machine has crept into Mr. Zirkle‘s
work this year as shown in the cast
bronze lit—u McCormick peering, 0r-
ganlc Gear and Impossible Gear. The
walnut limestone Ferguson 1V is, in my
opinion, his best sculpture and possibly
the best work in the Show The subtly
modeled walnut base gives the lime
stone a gentle life. The smooth, tlowlng
planes and lines or the limestone, corl~
trasted with the rough cut areas em-
phasizes the rock quality of the material
opposed by the beautirul biomorphio
form, No words can do justice to the
work

Merle Zirkle's jewelry exhibits super-
ior craftsmanship. Her weed bottles
echo the forms of tall weeds and are
strikingly beautilul. The large slab bot-
tle in the center Cabinet in the hallway
is sensational. Primitive linear design
and a complex, well-resolved design
make this work the most beautiful pot
l‘ve seen at Grinnell,

To write about a good work at art is
difficult if not imposslhle: it Can't be
expressed in Words This exhibition is
the perlect example or the above state
ment. It is too good to be missed.

Page Nina

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

one}

(Photo by bill Ratterty

Bland Blues Email

By PETER KEEPNEWS

When the marl himsell, Bobby “Blue"
Bland, pulled up in lrnnt ot Darby Gym
in his white Cadillac last Saturday
night, it was apparent that this was to
be no ordinary night at Grinnell. By the
time Bland set root on the Darby stage,
the entire gym was adritt in a sea oi
soullulness, blnesiness, and the kind at
musical euphoria you seldom ﬁnd in
this part or town.

Bland, the man who gave you such
hits as “Turn on Your Love Light’ and
“I Pity The Fool," put on quite a show.
It began when his band, Emie Flelds Jf.
and Company, played a heavy set ot
lunky jazz and soul numbers. Then a
beautiful young lady named Paulette
Parker sang and shouted her way into
the hearls and minds and bodies of the
audience, especially with her version or
“Twenty-ﬁve Miles to Go.” And then—
with the audience breathless with an:
llcipatian—Bobby Bland walked up to
the stage, began to sing—and it )Ja:
beautifuli ’

Bland's music is steeped in the [radio
tion or America’s only native art lorm,
the blues, and no words can do as good
a job as Bland's perlormanee did oi
explaining the universal appeal that th-
blues has. Sultice it to say that it you
missed the concert, you missed an op:
portunity to feel what it's like to be
really touched by the blues as sung by
a master. Bobby Bland really is a mas
(er a! his Craft (35 are his musician]
and Miss Parker), and it's quite some—
thing to have your soul stirred by a
master, This was soul. baby, and there’s
nolhing more that can be said than that.
it you have to ask what it is, you’ll
never know.

This was a great concert, the kind of
evening that makes going to Grinnell
seem worthwhile. One thing that helped
make it such a success was the way
the gym was decorated: it wasn't. There
were no chairs on the lloor and no crepe-
paper backdrop for the stage, and it was
great. It was the Fillmore Midwesth
people were tree to listen. dance, move
around, in short, to do their own thing
(a phrase i just invented). All that was
missing was a light Show. All Grinnell
concerts should be like this.

New This Year
EuroBUSpass in Europe—3 Weeks S88

As Well As Th
EuRA

Grinneil Tr

e Old Favorite,
Ilpass

avel Center

808 5th Avenue Court

Phone

236-4384
1364575

 

up. i...

4 Named ‘0utsanding’

Jonatha D. Busweli, Thor Evenson,
Bruce Rollins and Norris Stubbs hava
been selected for inclusion in the l9“
edition of "Outstanding College Athletes
of America."

Buswell, a lettermail in both football
and track, was twice hemmed all—Mid-
west. Conference honors in football and
was named Grinnell's most valuable
back in both 1966 and 1M6.

One of the most versatile trackrnen in
Grinneli History, Evenson, has scored
points in seVEn different individual
events as a pioneer—high jump, long
jump, triple jump, pole vault, high hur-
dles, inter-mediate hurdles, and low hur-
dies—and has also run on relay teams.
Also a letterman in basketball, Evensnn
scored 625 points to gain a spot among
Grillnell's top 15 career scorers.

The six-toot. seven-inch Rollins set
new school records in four ireestyle

yard, 60-yard, loo-yard, and

, —last winter during the tirst

season or varsity swimming. He also let-

tered last [all as all end on the Pioneer
innihall team.

"Timbers
To liraiisili

Donald J. Kralt5lk, an allerdlvest
Conierellce ioothali player and league
wrestling champion, was awarded the
David Theophilus. '51, trophy as Grin»
nell College’s outstanding senlor athlete
of 1968-1969, at the Honor “G” Letter—
men's banquet Thursday, May a. The
Tlieophilus award winner is selected on
the basis oi perlormance, leadership,
and scholastic records.

Kraitsik is h threcsyear leitermnn in
both football and wrestling. and was
captain of both teams this year.

Kraitsik also received two other
awards — the Louis Genias, ’42, award
tor displaying exceptional courage and]
or desire to compete in athletics and the
Charles Walker, ’56, trophy as the most
valuable wrestler.

Named as recipient or the G. Lester
Duke, ’25, trophy as outstanding fresh-
lnan athlete of 1968—69 was Charles W.
MCGrath, Jr. He set new Grinuell Imsh
records in the one», t\vo~, three-, and
four-mile runs as a member of Grinnell's
freshman cross country and track
teams, and also ran an the distance
medley loursomc that authored a new
trash record

A special award — an Honor G hlane
ket — was presented to James H.
Stauss, dean and provost oi the college.

The lollowing awards were also pre-
sented at the banquet:

Dick Uilr-ich, '33, trophy to the most
valuable football hack — to Jonathon
D. Btlswell. a senior.

Dick Ullrich, ’33, trophy to the most
valuable football lineman — to Robert
L Lillls. a senior.

John Welden, ’53, trophy to the most
valuable cross country runner — to Eric
P, Jahn, a sophomore.

Dave Duniop, '51, trophy to the most
valuable basketball player — to Terry
A. Holloway, a junior.

Robert Ross. '53, trophy to the most
valuable swimmer — to Bruce W. Rol-
lins, a sophomore.

FINAL IN SOFTBALL STANDINGS:

N. Younker . H Clam 54
ortCampus . in Cowlcs 45
Road . 7.2 Dibble . 1-;
East Norris 54 Loose . . N
West Norris . 5-4 Haines l4

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. my ti. lm

 

W

SPORTS

WWW

(Photo by Jim srorrn

GRINNELL third baseman, Bill Grey. attempts to tag out a Cue runner

stealing third base.

Stickmeh Swamp Siwasll

The Pioneer baseball team concluded
a rather dismal season Monday on a
bright note as they crushed Knox is to
2 and 19 to 6 in a game rescheduled be-
cause of rain last Saturday. Grinncll
loitcd ten home runs out at the iricndly
confines of Fowler Field in support at
Scott Hanson and Sam Chandler. Han-
son contributed three round irippers ty-
ing him tor the iinal club leadership in
home runs with Roger Roe who poled
two homers. Frank Dubach, completing
an incredibly rapid recovery ham or se
vere arm wound incurred earlier in the
season, had three home runs and lin-
ishcd the season butting an unbeliev-
able .5”. Roger Koester also had two
lour-baggers. Rick Vranek and Bill
Gray continued their hot hitting at late
as they collected live and four hits m~
speclively in the twinrbill.

This double victory left Grinnell third
in the ﬁnal standings t the Midwest
Conierence's southern d on. The Pics
neers, 4 and 8 in the Conlerence. wait
edged out by Monmouth, 12 and a, and
Cornell. 9 and 3s Last Friday the Mom
mouth Scots received quite a scare as
the Ploneers lost a heart-breaker 10 to
8 despite a 12 hit attaclt, Alter seven
and one-halt innings the Pioneers were
down 7 to 2 but two home runs by Roc
and Vraneit in the bottom oi the eighth
brought the diamondmen back into the
game. in the ninth, Coach Boyd pulled
out all stops and replaced tiring Phil
Wylie Wllh ace starter Scott Hanson.
But Hanson was no puzzle tor the Scots.
By the time Lee Arnetman could rescue
Hanson and get the side out, the Scots
had pushed across two more insurance
runs, These proved necessary as Grin-
nell rallied in the bottom of the ninth.
Don Peterson sandwiched a walk be»
tween hits by Arbetman and Gray, and
the Pioneers had the bases tilled with
nc one out. But the heart of the Grinnell
batting order could only drive two runs
across. not enough to pull the game out.
Starling pitcher Rich Weeks took the
loss. although he slammed his first
home run of the season,

Additions 0i Hirsch, Dix and Videtick
from the ireshman team will help
Boyd's batmen next year. but these ads

ditions will be far outweighed by senior
losses. Pmspecls for next season will
depend heavily on the incoming iresh-
man basebailers who, for the first time.
will be able lo play on the varsity level.

Season’s End

Hea ribreo ker
ly KEN SCHOFIELD

The Grinnell netman ended their sex
son on n dlsappointing note last week.
end by dropping a heartbrcskcr to Carl:-
ton by u soon oi 5-4 on Friday and
than being dumped by a consistent 5t.
0lai team in on Saturday. This dropped
their record to 57 overall and 54 in
contcrcncc play. The team. which it
composed oi a seniors, Grant Crandaii,
Doug Gilbertson and Phil Hooper and
tour sophs, Phil Mcars, Jim Spell,
Chris Vaughan, and Ken Schoiield, was
much improved, over last year's team
which compiled a 1—9 record.

The best records oi the season went
to Spell and Vaughan who each compiled
excellent 8-4 records against stiii com<
petition.

The team travels to Beloil tor the
Conlerence Championships this weekend.
With Spell and Vaughan and the doubles
duo oi Schalield~Vaughan certain to be
sceded. the team is looking lot at least
a third place iinish.

As icr next year's team, the outlook
is even bnighter as the 4 seasoned jun-
iors will be joined by a talented group
or sophs headed by Ed DeBus and Car»
ids Mendoza.

;Grad Week

(Continued from Page 6)

night at which Susan Kaeser, Grant
Crandall. and Tom Tripleti will speak.

There will also be a ROTC commence-
ment at 9:00 Friday morning ill the
North lounge. At this ceremony Curtis
anr, lumre Assistant Secretary or Man-
power tor the Air Force who will also
receive an honorary Doctor at Humane
Letters degree lmm the college later
in the afternoon. wilLEive I speech.

Golf Piclure Gloomy

By JOHN WINTERSON

The Pioneer goll team probably went
through its longest season ever this
spring. For many or the matches Coach
Bowers could not even field a lull lives
man squad. Plain old had luck struck
the Pioneers hard.

Bruce Peterson, last year's Number 1
man with the irosh, and this spring, the
varisity's Number 2 man, was iorced
to leave the team because or a heavy
academic load which didn't allow him
enough time ior practice. Paul Jacobs
son, a senior who (or the past two sen-
soils was in and out of the starting line.
up. could not participate this spring
because of a season long illness.

The team has sorely missed Paul this
spring and are hoping he’ll recover in
time [or this weekend's conference meet.

Bill Gray, a senior, has performed
Well when in action this season, but has
only played in three matches due to
action with the baseball team, (Bill was
starting shortstop and hit .315 ior the
Pioneer lollrrbziggers.)

And it those weren’t enough troubles.
out oi the tour regulars on the team.
only Jollll thlersml had any varsity
experience beicre [his year. Willtel'smi
has held down the number 1 Spot all
spring.

Bill Cllrclwn, a sophomore, has play-
ed number 2 man most of the spring
and has done commendably well, Bill
posted a 76 this year against iotva State.
however, in a losing cause,

Kevin Frewert and Ralph “Whitey"
Christensen have rounded out the squad
in the third and lourtb positions.

The Pioneers were winiess in their
eight outings this spring. They lace Mid-
west Conterence Meet action in Beloll,
Wisconsin this afternoon and tomorrow.
ll Jacobson is in condition to play and
the others play up to their potential, a
respectable ﬁnish could still be in the
oiling for Grinnell.

Monmouth

Hy NORRIS STUBBS

Last Friday, Evenson victorious in the
high jump, in yds. high, and 440 in-
tcrmcdiates, coupled with the sprinter
duo Norris Stubbs and Gordy Able to
lead the Pioneers to a 7540 edge over
powerful Monmouth.

Both 44a and mile relay teams turned‘
in the best times at 44:6 and 3:201}.

Today and tomorrow the Pioneers wiu
be at Beluit competing in the Annual
Midwest Conference meet. Coach Ober-
miller believes that the team will give
a good showing — desp te the set-backs
encountered this season; not only has
there been an abnormal number of ins
juries but the team. not having a homo
track. has sutiercd greatly,

Thor Evensorl, a consistent periormcr
is favored to take the high jump.

Sprinter Norris Stubhs, who is having
the worst season in his career owing to
a pulled muscle and injured achilles
tendon, has been shaping up in the past
week. Stubbs was chested out of ﬁrst
place in the 100 yd. dash two weeks ago
by present contcrencc champion Mess-
man of Lawrence. Thue two will meet
again today and Stubbs is certain that
it will be a diiierent story

Gordon Abel has had so far. A ﬁne
season. He has been showing persistenu
ly good iorm in the loo. zoo. and 400 yd,
Abel also hindered somewhat by muscu-
lar trouble will Compete in the 22!) and
440 at the conference.

nill Schooler is also looking good.- he
will make a bid at the 880 yd. run. Bill
has been In invaluable member at ball]
the MI] and mile relay tennis.

 

Friday, May is. I969

 

 

 

 

 

 

Photo by Susln Kaeser
Black Further V. Charles Smith

Panthers Rap

Black Panther Deputy Minister or De-
fense, V. Charles Smith spoke here Sun-
day to a group of small but interested
students. First planned as a rally, and
billed as including a live rock band, the
event fell apart to some degree; the
rock band failed to show and the crowd
was small, But Smith felt that the
amount of feedback from his hour-long
talk had made the trip worthwhile.

The Black Panthers of Des Moines are
touring college campuses in Iowa this
month to explain their politics and raise
money to rebuild their Des Moines heada
quarters, which was recently destroyed
by a planted bomb.

SCARLET AND BLACK

Page Eleven

“It's What's Happening"

ly RICH WlCKSTRDM

Today, from 35 and 7:303:30 a hap-
pening, Crowds will be presented on
Barber Plaza and in Arena Theatre.
Since there is such vast misunderstand-
ing about the iorm or a happening, per-
haps a briet description is in order.

The happening grew, in part, out or
the use of collage, Artists found it in-
adequate to be restricted to a two di-
mensional surface on which to attach
real objects of personal meaning. An
Enviomnment was created, lilling an en
tire room with objects, light, and sound.
It was soon realized that visitors who
entered the Environment became a part
of it. They were given tasks to do.
Eventually people became objects —
their performance was the embodiment
of an idea. As such, no acting, artificial
programmed emotion or movements, is
employed. The happening is composed
of compartmentalized, hermetic units,
arranged in an alogical tashion. There
is no information transmitted from one
event to another. Although indetermin-
acy irequenlly enters the events, it is
carefully controlled by the artist. Im-
provision never occurs in a true hap-
pening. Things do not just happen as
the world would lead one to believe.
Finally, the audienceparticipant barrier
of traditional theatre is broken down to
a greater or lesser extent. Visitors are
at times instructed to pertorm certain
tasks, thus involving them directly in
the action. To (IO—ordinate all of this ad-
mittedly complex action, a script is used

 

Sportswear

at the “IN" at Poynier’s Downstairs.

COUNTRY SET

COLLEGE TOWN
JOHN MEYER
MR. THOMSON
GARLAND
CATALINA
CATALINA JRS.

WHITE STAG

You’ve Never Seen So Much Fashion
In One Little SIore

@npmeyg ‘iil’l Ave. Positions, int.

GRINNELL'S COMPLETE STYLE SHOP FOR WOMEN
SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY

Store Hours:

Noon 'Til 9 Mondays: 9

"I'll 5 Tuesday thru Saturday

and most happenings are rehearsed Sev-
eral times before production.

Last weekend an Activity (technically
dlfierent but related to a Happening)
was presented in Iowa City by Allan Ka-
prow. it took place in two parts. Part I
consisted of driving to Cedar Bluff. Iowa,
by the banks of the Cedar River and
digging trenches trom the river as far
up the bank as we desired, We were
instructed we could dig in any manner
we wished as long as it was done de-
votedly. A power shovel perlormed the
same tasks as we did. These trenches
were then flooded, the most downstream
one first, by water carried from the
river in titty buckets. We watched the
water ﬂow back to the river, then re-
filled the buckets at the mouth of that
trench and proceeded upstream to the
next one. This was repeated until every
trench (about 7.0 in all) was flooded.
This completed Part 1.

Part II consisted of telling the world
about what we did in Part I. We were
to use any and every means of com-
mnnication at our disposal. As such, the
preceding two paragraphs are part of
the activity at Iowa City which is the
only rationale for their inclusion in this
article.

Anyway, the happening In Grinnel’l.
the project originally oi the Art Collo-
quium (now the project or pltiiully zew
students oi the Art colloquium as
well as other interested students,
inculty members and organizations),
has been written to conform as
closely as possible to an actual happen-
ing. The imagery used in the events,
although more blatant than in most hap-
penings, is aimed at problems and social
conditions which have been hugging us,
For example. a mock cocktail party will
be held in Arena theatre. People will be
given cups with cards attached. On these
cards will be lines; a question, an an-
swer, and an exclamation, one oi which
to be read at random to people you meet
who will respond with a line picked at
random from their card. in another
event, the world of “law enforcement"
will be experienced in a bicycle ride on
central campusr Here come da judge.

One of the main goals of this venture
Is to involve as many people as possible
in activities which are both meaningful
and tun. In most of the events all spec-
tators will become participants. Wear
a costume, bring a bicycle, or just walk
up: it will be enjoyable, and, yes Grin.
nell, :1 Valid intellectual endeavorr

.———E—.ﬁ
Senate Settles Finances

By TOM THOMAS

Money allocations have been the
prime order at business lor the Senate
during the past two weeks. Topics oi
Consideration have included aid to the
Blaira benelit, legal fees tor the Play-
hoy demonstrators, and approval at the
annual budget.

Last Wednesday, the Senate voted to
nllot $50 for legal defense of the “Grln~
nell eight.” The motion, represented by
Senator Andy Loewi, was passed $3.
This week Senator Reggie Graham and
Gina Mills asked that the Senate re-
consider thelr action. Miss Mills com-
mented, “I don’t believe that it was a
decision representative of the student
body." She went on to state that “I pay
a $50 activity fee here and I don’t think
it should go to just eight people."

Tom Thomas responded that he felt
the issue concerned the entire college
campus. “The question here is
whether or not Richard Turner Ind
his cohorts can lntnlde on this cum—
pus with the storm trooper tactics
used in this case and get away
with it" Thomas also pointed out
that well over half the campus had
signed petitions supporting the right
of the demonstrators to protest,
whether or not they agreed with the
tactics used.

Senator Bill Thomas supported tlle
former SGA president by detailing the
methods used by Turner‘s investigators
and cautioning the Senate that such pi-o-
tedures could easily ailect many other
students on the campus. Alter extended
debate, the Senate, on a motion by Art
Knowles, unanimously voted to i-eaiiirm
[be original allocation ivitli a notation ot
indications of student support expressed
through petitions.

The Senate also considered proposed
Cuts in the salarles of AWS and C of
HP presidents. C of HP President Wes

ton apposed such a move on the grounds.

that “this is a value judgment of the-
Senate that can only be made on the
basis Lil what others have done. I think
this is unlair. particularly when It was
assumed that the salary would remain
the same at the time we ran.” The Sen:
ole voted to maintain the salaries at
the present level of £250. Similar dis.
cussion lollowed a proposal to increase
the salary of the Student Coordinator,
which was tabled for furmer discussion.

In earlier action, the Senate allotted
$241 to the Bialra benefit held last Sat-
urday and donated 3100 to the Blalran
Rellei Fund. Drea Dungv. coordinator
at the event, reported Ihat expenditure-
exceeded anticipations, and an addition-
al $55 were allocated for the Initiative
Fund.

in iormulating next year's budget, the
Senate essentially iollowed closely the
lines at this year’s expenditures, The
Grinnell Draft Information Center, how-
ever, received no iunds from SGA in
hopes that the organization will be sup-
ported hy the administration as a coun-
selling service.

A new item In the budget, recom-
mended by last veal-s Finance Com-
mittee was the Public Events Fund.
In explaining the move, Finance
Committee chairman Andrew Brill
said the fund would consolidate the
many expenditures for public events
now being made by SGA imm diverse
accounts. Brill told the 5513 that the
fund was [or events that would not
fall under Ihe jurisdiction of me
Initiative Fund or the Social Coordi-
nating Committee.

SGA President Lew announced that
remaining vacancies on Studentrfaculty
Committees would be tilled in the fall.
It was also reported that the Student
Affairs Committee had recommended
that students living oft-campus next year
have the option of not paying beard tees.
President Leggett has not taken any he
tion as at yet.

DAN‘igid MAM EAEtEE'iY

The Finest In Pastries

Usual and Unusual.
8T8 FOURTH AVENUE

 

SCARLET AND BLACK

Moves Made Toward Understanding

oy KATHY BULL

Things with town~coliege communica-
non are chugging right along. On May
1 some students and the people of the
Episcopal Church discussed the Viet-
nam war and the changing policies of
the US. They agreed that students and
other citizens are responsible ior bring-
ing their opinions to the attention of pol-
icy makers. Father TarlCreti said that
most oi the people that attended felt it
was an anceuragingly healthy and help-
ful discussion and hope that there wlll
be more of them.

Henry Scheif, Bill Thomas, Mike
Siegel, Rob Harlan. Mike Drayton, Dave
llnlmans and Phil Saslch talked with
about 25 members of the First Baptist
Church on May 4. They began by read-
ing a copy oi Ted Gilck's letter to his
drait board stating why he is resisting
the draft. After this, they hmke up into
groups of eight or nine, Henry Scheil
commented, “it was quite good. in gen-
oral, they seemed to think more of col-
lege students and understand better
why Gllck did it." Some of the topics
that were talked about in his group
were town-college relations, race, the
war, and resisting. Another group dis-
cussed the power of corporations and
reasons why there are some people who
reel so much more strongly about the
war than others and why people ieel
alienated irom government organiza-
tions. Bill Thomas, who was a member
of this group, felt that they were in
basic agreement about the War but felt
varying degrees of urgency. Many
people thought that Nixon could still do
something about it and that the talks
in Paris are not succeeding because the
North Vietnamese are obstructing them.

Also on May 4, Tom Mill, Tony No-
yak, Bill Parks, Carol Patterson, Nick
Russo, Bruce Armstrong and Captain
Perdum discussed the Vietnam war,
dissent and iorelgn policy with about

10 members oi the Presbyterian
Church. Afterwards. Novak commented
that although he would love to be an
optimist and think that We will get tD<
geiher, he believes that the best way
to maintain sanity is to isolate our-
selves. improve our self-determination
and make ourselves tree. Russo said
that he realized that a compromise was
necessary to get the resolution to the
City Council. He feels it is necessary to
simply agree that the war is unjust and
not demand agreement on the proce-
dures ior ending it.

Mark Graeser, Bruce Balls, Jared
VanWagenen and Dr. Leggett talked
with the Chamber of Commerce recent-
ly. Dr. Leggett, a member of the Cham-
ber of Commerce. introduced the stub
dents and spoke about the need for com-
munication. The board members and
the students briefly discussed the war
and action that could be taken in the
town. At the Chamber oi Commerce
meeting last Wednesday they were go-
ing to consider whether they wanted to
talk further with students.

The high school student body presi-
dcnt, Doug Kochneli, and some or his
friends and a group or college students
met a few weeks ago and decided on a
number or things they could do in the
high school about the war in Vietnam.
Andy Loewl, who talked with Kochneff,
has been trying to contact Kochneii to
ﬁnd out what, ii anything, has been
done; but he has been unable to reach
him.

Lynn Aldrich, Andy Loewl, Peter Keep.
news, David Feldman and Lee Shamr
berg are on a committee that will meet
with Miss Georgia Dental the first week
oi school next year to establish a defi-
nite policy about high school attendance
at college events. Loewi says that some
college students have been upset by the
idea or high school students attending
events that they (college students) paid
lor.

s—-———————————‘——ﬁ

Tinker Takes Comps To Task

By KATHY KARLSON

No one questions the fact that the
comprehensive examinations at Grin-
nell vary trom department to depan~
ment in difficulty and in importance.
About three weeks ago, senior Bonnie
Tinker decided that she could not take
an examination she felt to be a mean-
ingless test of her education. She dis-
tributed a statement to seniors. calling
tor a meeting to discuss the justice at
comprehensive examinations. A few peo-
ple showed up, but Miss Tinker was the
only senior who decided to refuse to
take the examination.

On April 26, she wrote 1 statement,
“Academic Ritual -— A comprehensive
Examination," during the time allotted
for her written examination which ques-
tioned the legitimacy oi judging a tour
year educational experience in two and
a half hours, During the time designated
for her oral comprehensive, she contin-
ued discussion of this statement, insist-
ing at that time that “I would not
answer questions that were part of an
oral examination, but that I would be
happy to talk to them about my posi-
tlcns on comps, or anything else they
cared to discuss as long as it was clear
that I was not taking an examination."

Unofficially notified that she had
flunked her examinations, Miss Tinker
then petitioned the Committee on Aca-
demic Standing requesting that the re-
quirement he waived for the class of
1969. The committee unanimously rec-
ommended that the requirement not be
waived, and on May 1, the Executive
Council unanimously declined to waive
the requirement. Miss Tinker than roe
‘uuted that the Executive Council hoax

her arguments against the examination.
she will meet with a sub-committee of
the Executive Council on Friday, May
16.

Miss Tinker insists that the examina<
tion is meaningless because it varies
ircm department to department, and
that it is destructive to the educational
process because “they make an individ-
ual dependent upon extemal judgments
tor a good sell—Concept, thereby threat-
ening his uniqueness."

“Colleges have caught themselves be-
tween two poles,” she said. “On the
one hand, they want to say that edu-
cation is indeed more than, the storage
vi a given body oi information. on the
other hand, they want to continue to
apply quantitative measures which can
be transcribed into a qualitative judg.
men ."

Miss Tinker will request an individual
waiver from the requirement or will re.
quest that her letter written during the
time allotted for comm be counted as a
comprehensive examination.
m

) Existence
(Continued from Page 2)

Man ha: no vested right to interfere
wtth ecology."

The other two candidates were more
lucclnct in their answers. One said, “I
try harder.” The other answered, “I am
instilled by your existence.‘

A few other faculty members retum-
ed the test unanswered, but ”wrote their
own" by saying, “It was stupid," and
“I would have filled it out if I had had
the time." The Executive Council will
decide whether or not to accept these
examinations.

THE FLAG POLE was the center at lemonade sales,

rrldry’ May it 1m,

Photo by Susan Kami-
proceeds from which

were donated to the Playboy demonstrators‘ legal fluid. The demonstrators aro
slill lacking 5515 at the necessary $1200 ior legal services.

 

“Grinnell 8" Trial Set

The date of May 26 has been set [or
the trial of eight Grinnell students who
allegedly dlsrobed during a Feb. 5 Gates
Lounge lecture by a representative or
Playboy magazine, The students, who
are charged with “indecent exposure,"
will appear in Poweshiek County Dis-
trict Court in Montezuma.

Charges against a ninth student
were dropped at a preliminary hearing
in Grinnell on March 26.

Indecent exposure is an indictable
misdemeanor under iowa law carrying
a penalty of sbt months’ imprisonment
or a $200 fine.

College Advertises
Anti-War Statement

By SOL BABEUF

Last Thursday, more than 800 student!
and faculty sponsored and endorsed I
statement appearing in the Grinncll
Herald-Register. The ad (approximate
cost—$140.00), was the product oi oi pho.
nomenon rm to this campus: a joint
student - ioculty - administration cooper-
ative effort. The statement, which con-
damned the war in Vietnam as neither
“necessary nor just," and called on
President Nixon to terminate this coun-
try’s involvement in SE. Asia "at
quickly as possible," was signed and
paid for by almost 98% of tho iacully,
including Glen Leggett and Jamel
Stauss.

The idea for the ad grew out of a dis<
cussion between Leggett and about
twenty students on the day oi th ﬂan

ADDRESS HERE:

PTERO Probe Resumes a

Agents from the Iowa Attorney Gen. ,
elal 5 Office were in Grinnell again last 1
week to further investigate the activities ‘
oi Pterndactyl, Gtinl‘lell’s underground
newspaper whose copy and photographs
were illegally seized by state agents at
a printing shop last March and were
recently returned to the owners after a
court injunction was issued. -

Assistant Attorney General Douglaﬂ: .
Carlson and other agents visited with
at least nine Grinnell high school stu-
dents and their parents to gather lnior-
mailon about how Pterodactyl is distrib- i
uted to high School youth! Six of the
students questioned by the agents are
staii members for The Beam, the
high school underground paper.

One at the students questioned last
week sold that the agents were also try-
ing to determine if there was “a link"
between the two underground papers. -
He also said that alter being interview-“9
ed, the students were asked by (hi
agents to sign written statements based
on what they had told the agents. -,

The confiscated issue of Ptemdacrﬁ
in currently being printed our of stat.
and should be ready for distribution
early next week, according to mem-
bers of the paper's stall,
22:: - 3
“incident," during which Leggett wnl
asked to take a stand ml the war (a lo
Calvin Plimpton). That evening, after
the liberation or the Forum, Leggelt lug
formed certain students that he would >
be willing to sign, as an individual, a
stetament opposing the war. The noun]
bunch of student and faculty busybodiel
then busled themselves with writing (in i
statement and procuring signatures.

 

